
Saga 3: Glitched
One year has passed since the fall of Darkrai.

The story begins within the deepest levels of Gardevoir's Black Hole prison. The five inmates, Cramorant, Mr. Mime, Buzzwole, Ceruledge, and Armarouge, have now spent a full year behind bars. Their confinement situations have changed: Mime and Cramorant are stationed in nearby hover cells, locked in place by an electrified anti-gravity system. Though not as extreme as a black hole, the shock system punishes even the slightest breach attempt.

Meanwhile, Ceruledge and Armarouge, each confined in isolated black hole zones, have slipped into mental collapse. Suicidal thoughts swirl between the once-feared bandit brothers. Both have refused food for two days, their hunger now overshadowed by hollow despair.

Buzzwole, however, remains mentally stable. Having shown signs of cooperation, he’s been moved to a brighter, more spacious room. Urshifu now visits him twice weekly, offering meditative lectures and allowing him extended time in a reinforced gym enclosure. Buzzwole listens silently, stoic, yet subtly changed.

-

Hover Cell Area – Mr. Mime and Cramorant

Mime leans toward Cramorant, whispering slyly.
“Ceruledge and Armarouge? Pathetic. Starving for pity. Let them rot.”

Cramorant glares back blankly, before spitting water into Mime’s face.
“I want food,” he croaks bluntly.

Unfazed, Mime levitates untouched food trays meant for the bandit brothers. They hover toward Cramorant like treasure chests. He devours them noisily. Mime smirks.

“I’ve got bigger plans. Darkrai's gone, good riddance. Tyranitar? Might be useful... if I finish the Manifest Key first.”
A loud ZZZAP cuts him off mid-sentence as a spark lashes from the cell's edge. Mime flinches, electrocuted again in comical fashion. Cram snorts a laugh, still chewing.

-

Mime’s Secret Unfolds

Mime has been planning. Deeply. Secretly.

He whispers cruelly about Cinderace’s “pathetic” death, and unveils his secret tools:

- Cinderbot, a robot duplicate built with full Pyro Ball and Blaze Kick capabilities.

- Mimebot, a silent mimic equipped with stealth tech and psychic shielding.

“I waited. The guard's weak. And I’ve already checked your name, Cram. You're on the list now.” Mime grins. “Help me… and I feed you forever.”

-

Night of the Breakout

Late one night, General Officer Machamp snores at his post.

Mimebot quietly deploys a voice-dampening cube, muting all sound within a 10-meter radius. No noise escapes. Cinderbot melts through the glass of the hover cell with a focused heat kick.

Mime floats across his platform without a sound, quickly boxing Cramorant’s head to silence his reflex squawks. The two inmates slip out, undetected. They flee into the abyss.

-

Return to the Lab

They arrive at Mime’s old laboratory, buried beneath rubble and dust from the old Darkspin Studios collapse. Broken screens flicker faintly, and schematics cover the cracked floor.

A terminal boots up.
On it: a list.
Two names checked off, Mime and Cinderace.
Next: Cramorant.
And below that… more names. Ominous. Unspoken. Unseen.

Mime turns toward his new sidekick.
“Let’s rebuild the future. With bots that never fail.”

Cramorant gurgles a response, already eyeing the snack bar nearby.
The lab hums to life.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



At the Lab
Mime turned to Cramorant and said calmly, “This will sting a little.” He fired a blueprint-DNA dart into Cram, extracting every trace of his DNA and innate power. The dart gently released, and Mime carefully loaded the data into one of his old, dusty auto-bot builders, of which several lined the lab, though only two had been activated so far: one using Mime’s DNA, and one using Cinderace’s.

As the machine whirred to life, processing Cram’s data, Mime casually began explaining how he obtained Cinderace’s DNA not long before the rabbit’s death.

-

Flashback – One Year Ago
It was a sunny day, still before the climax that would later ruin Tyranitar’s manor. Mime had escaped the estate undetected and wandered deep into a forgotten stretch of the sewers. There, hidden in darkness, he discovered an ominous list, a blueprint catalog of optimal DNA matches for future combat bots.

The first name on the list: Coach Cinderace.

Mime didn’t waste time. Still that very day, coincidentally, just before nightfall when Cramorant would go berserk, Mime traveled to the football stadium. Cinderace was mid-game, showing off for the crowd while his then-girlfriend, Lopunny, cheered from the stands.

Seizing the moment, Mime caught the football mid-air with his psychic powers. As Cinderace jogged up, irritated, Mime issued a quiet threat: he wouldn’t return the ball unless he could copy the rabbit’s DNA.

Cinderace reluctantly agreed, but not without lashing out. “You freak! Hope Darkrai tears you apart and paints the walls in your blood! Not even Ho-Oh could revive your twisted little head!” he spat.

Mime just smiled politely. “Your words may bite you in the back someday,” he said, then floated away.

Unseen in the crowd, an innocent Cramorant, still mentally stable, watched the encounter, head tilted in confusion. Mime, meanwhile, secretly hoped Darkrai would die, removing the last wild card from his long game.

-

Back to the Present
With a hiss and a flash of blue light, the Cramorant bot powered up. It resembled the original perfectly, complete with its gaping beak and unpredictable swallowing behavior, but with one major upgrade: its Water Pulse blast packed enough force to punch a hole straight through the lab wall on its first test.

Cramorant twitched, drooled, and tilted his head with a lopsided grin.
“Food buddy?” he asked, barely blinking.

Mime smirked. “Soon enough.”


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Soon, the bot had a name: Crambot.
A perfect mimic of Cramorant in appearance, but enhanced, refined, and dangerous. Its Water Pulse now tore through walls like paper. Mime grinned at the satisfying hum of the machine, his collection growing.

-

The Next Day – CottonCheer Boutique
CottonCheer had quietly blossomed over the past four months, a cozy tailor shop nestled on the sunny edge of town, owned and run by none other than Eldegoss, the elegant cotton puff and local fashion icon. Known for her all-weather clothing and floral-themed accessories, she had recently become the personal stylist of Vaporeon, who arrived that day humming a tune and twirling in excitement.

“I’ll take this cheerleader outfit for me… and that quarterback jersey for my Flareon,” Vaporeon beamed, picturing the fire-type’s reaction. She skipped out the door, swaying her tail happily, only to pause when she noticed Chandelure hovering by the window display.

“I’d like to try something on too,” Chandelure chimed softly, a rare sparkle of curiosity in her ghostly glow.

Eldegoss gave a warm but apologetic smile. “I’m so sorry, dear. I haven’t finished designing outfits for your… unique frame yet. I promise you’re on my list!”

Chandelure floated off silently, disappointed, her ghost flames dimmed. As fate would have it, she drifted near a shadowed alley, unknowingly brushing past a concealed figure.

Mr. Mime, hidden behind a stack of boxes, flinched as one of Chandelure’s wandering flames grazed his hair, leaving a faint scorch. He growled under his breath. So close…

But he wasn’t deterred. Today’s mission was still a success waiting to happen.

Mime summoned Crambot, cloaked in stealth mode nearby. With surgical precision, the bot launched a soft DNA-collecting dart toward Eldegoss, striking her gently in the cotton fluff of her head as she stood at the storefront beside Vaporeon.

A flicker of dizziness washed over Eldegoss. “Hmm… must’ve stood up too fast,” she murmured, brushing it off with a laugh.

Vaporeon didn’t notice. She couldn’t, Mime had already psychically veiled the dart’s path from her vision, casting an illusion so smooth she didn’t blink.

Mime, invisible to both, calmly levitated the dart back to his coat pocket, smiling with satisfaction. Another name checked off the list.

As the two ladies chatted, the real Cramorant waddled nearby and swallowed a Vespiquen whole, the prize fished out lazily by Mime using a floating berry as bait. Mime rewarded him with a slow nod. "Good boy."

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



The Next Targets: Two Icy Birds with One Dart

Mime didn’t rest. Momentum was everything now.

His next stop: the frosty, peaceful home of Mamoswine and his wife, Alolan Ninetales, a cozy hilltop cottage with a garden of snowberries and a windchime that never melted.

The couple were notoriously low-profile, rarely leaving their home, making them ideal targets. But Mime knew one flaw he could exploit: Ninetales’ clumsiness.

From a distance, Mime observed through a shimmer veil, as Ninetales twirled playfully in a light blue sundress, giggling while setting lunch outside on a patio table. Mamoswine was grunting happily, bringing over a tray of berry dumplings.

That’s when Mime made his move.

Using a flicker of invisible tech under her paws, he tripped Ninetales just as she stepped over the picnic cloth.

CRASH. The entire table went flying, plates, dumplings, tea kettle, everything.

“Oopsie, !!” Ninetales yelped as she tumbled into a half-somersault, a blur of white fluff and fabric.

Mamoswine’s eyes widened. “Honey?! Are you alright?!”

He rushed to help her up, completely distracted by the mess. Ninetales was giggling through her daze. “I’m okay! Just dizzy… maybe extra dizzy?”

Perfect.

From behind a frozen bush, Mime smirked and flicked his fingers. Two DNA darts zipped forward silently, one lodged into Mamoswine’s thick hide, and the other nestled neatly into Ninetales’ flowing mane.

A second later, they vanished back to Mime’s coat pocket, mission complete before the couple even realized they were targeted.

Mime didn’t linger. He slipped back down the hill where Cramorant was crunching down on some icicles… and half a landscaping rock.

“Two icy Pokémon,” Mime mused aloud, watching Cram drool proudly, “with one stone.”

Cram paused, blinked at him, and mumbled, “Stone tasty.”

Mime patted him on the beak. “You’re even dumber than your bot. I like that.”



--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Next Target: The Fallen Flame

Talonflame had once been a proud ace of the skies, a battle-hardened aerialist with a knack for risk and glory. But after a harsh financial collapse and a near-successful suicide dive off Mount Solace, he found unexpected salvation: Ho-Oh.

Now, Talonflame served as Ho-Oh’s assistant and watchman, a second chance he took seriously, perhaps too seriously. He’d taken up foraging as a mindful hobby, searching wild berry groves atop windy hills, savoring the peace he once tried to flee.

But Mime had his name on the list.

And Talonflame’s instincts were sharp, too sharp for a clean sneak attack.

So Mime devised something dumber.

He turned to his hungry bird partner. “Cram,” he whispered, “go call him a fried chicken.”

Cramorant blinked, twitched… then waddled straight out into the open.

“Hey! You! Roast turkey with wings! I’ll eat your feathers and still be hungry!”

Talonflame froze mid-peck, eyes twitching.

“…You what?!”

With a screech of rage, Talonflame exploded into the air, blazing like a rocket. “YOU WANNA FRY?! I’LL SHOW YOU KAMIKAZE!!”

He dove full-speed at Cramorant, who barely ducked in time.

CRACK, ! Talonflame’s head slammed into a sturdy tree trunk, beak-first, and lodged into the bark with a sickening thunk.

Dazed. Stuck. Breathing ragged.

Mime didn’t waste a moment. He swooped in from the brush, and with a flick of a wrist, lodged a DNA dart under the flaming bird’s wing. Then he tapped his temple and poured psychic energy into Talonflame’s brain like bleach down a drain, scrubbing the last five minutes from memory.

But it came at a cost. Moderate strain, enough to make Mime stagger as he retreated.

Cramorant waddled alongside him, giggling. “Birdie bonked tree.”

Mime frowned. “That almost went too far.”

Back at the tree, Talonflame’s body trembled, he was suffocating. His wings flapped weakly as he gasped.

“…Ho… Ho-Oh…”

A golden feather shimmered overhead.

Within seconds, Ho-Oh descended in blinding light, eyes wide with panic. “Talon?!”

But it was too late.

Talonflame’s last breath escaped before the legendary could reach him. His flame extinguished.

Ho-Oh knelt, then closed his eyes, revival light engulfed the body, breathing life back into the watchman once more.

Moments later, Talonflame opened his eyes.

“…Wh-what happened?”

Ho-Oh looked around. “You were dying. Do you remember what struck you?”

Talon blinked slowly. “I… I was foraging. Then… I don’t know. It’s blank.”

From behind the bush, Mime and Cramorant sat crouched, watching in dead silence.

Mime whispered, still panting. “…That… was almost bad.”

Cramorant drooled. “Friend chicken came back.”

Mime wiped sweat off his face. “Next time, less lethal. I don’t need Ho-Oh sniffing us out.”



--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Back at the Lab

Four new figures lined the shadowy workbench, Eldebot, Ninetalebot, Mamobot, and Talonbot, each bearing the signature traits of their organic counterparts. Eldebot’s cotton spun like reactive armor. Ninetalebot's tails flicked with chilling grace. Mamobot’s tusks gleamed with reinforced metal. Talonbot's wings pulsed with overheating thrusters, now tamed to follow orders.

Mime’s fingers twitched in satisfaction. “Four down. Too many more to go.”

He turned to Cramorant, who was currently trying to swallow an empty soup can.

Mime sighed. “Let’s move.”

-

Next Targets: Blissey and Snorlax

The location: Umbreon’s private hospital, a facility known for its unshakable neutrality and tight psychic security. Most feared breaching it, Mean Look traps, aura scans, Umbreon’s eternal insomnia.

Mime feared none of it. He feared only sloppiness.

He knew Umbreon had a habit of sleeping only two hours every third day. That was today.

Mime arrived during visitor hours, invisible, odorless, and unnervingly calm.

Inside, Blissey cheerfully bustled through the halls with patient trays. Snorlax, recently reformed from his greedy years, now proudly served as the hospital chef, ladling stew into trays with sleepy grace. He hummed while he worked, occasionally snacking, occasionally nodding off mid-scoop.

Mime watched from a hidden vent above. With careful aim, he telekinetically embedded the DNA darts under the plastic lids of two lunch trays. One bound for Blissey’s hands. One for Snorlax’s personal snack.

Thunk.
Thunk.

Two soft injections, barely noticeable. Blissey winced slightly, but remained focused on delivery. Snorlax yawned and ate his.

Meanwhile, outside the hospital…

A nearby trash bin rocked violently. From inside, Cramorant poked his head out, drooling and very full.

He had eaten something.

Mime, now returned to the bin in invisible form, materialized with a rustle of wrappers.

He retrieved both darts, intact and glowing faintly with bio-data.

Then he paused.

His nose twitched.

“…Cram. Did you…?”

Cramorant tilted his head, utterly innocent, then pooped in the bin again.

Mime stared in cold silence. “You absolute seagull-brained, stop eating hospital leftovers. That’s not pudding!”

He levitated both darts, gagging quietly, and began to clean them with the same cloth he used to wipe Cram’s mouth.

Cram just drooled and chirped. “More food buddy?”

Mime shoved the lid back over the bin. “Not now. Next batch’s gonna be harder.”


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Next Targets: Greedent and Crustle

These two weren’t just any targets, they were trolls. And not just any trolls. Greedent, now loudmouthed and proudly vulgar, and Crustle, slightly more chill these days, but still prone to passive-aggressive jabs. Ever since Tyranitar cut them loose, the two had downgraded to being delivery boys, not by choice, but because no one else would take them.

One fine afternoon, Greedent was in Flareon's yard, yelling at him.

“Your food’s too spicy, furball! You try eatin' with scorched taste buds!”

Flareon, who had just finished prepping his fire-grilled berry kabobs, shot him a glare. “And maybe you shouldn’t be snacking on deliveries, you walking trash bin!”

Crustle, standing awkwardly behind the scene, mumbled under his breath, “You used to cook my relatives…”

Greedent cackled. “What, you mean the crabs? Hah!”

Without another word, Flareon shot a tiny flamethrower straight at Greedent’s rear.

“YEOWCH!”

Greedent bolted into a mad dash, running in circles across the yard, his fluffy tail dropping half-digested blue berries like confetti. Crustle calmly picked them up, one by one.

In the bushes nearby, three shadows lurked: Mime, Cramorant, and Crambot.

Mime sniffed the air. “Perfect. Fire, noise, distraction…”

He turned to the real Cram. “Break the sprinkler system.”

Cram nodded in full derp mode and launched a Water Gun at the fuse box.

The sprinklers burst to life, Greedent screamed in glee, trying to plant his burnt butt onto one of them while hopping like a panicked Psyduck. Crustle continued collecting dropped berries like nothing was wrong.

Now.

Mime released two invisible DNA darts, one for each of them. They struck clean, Crustle didn’t even flinch, and Greedent just thought it was a mosquito.

Mission complete. Mime retrieved the darts with psychic precision… albeit a bit damp from the sprinklers.

Cram, now sniffing around Flareon’s BBQ, turned to Mime and asked with his usual innocent voice:
“Can I eat the food? …Can I eat Flareon?”

Mime paused, glanced at Flareon, and whispered, “No. His mother is Espeon. She’ll call the authorities… and worse, she's useful later.”

Flareon, now steaming with rage, screamed:
“Get out of my yard, you filthy pests!!”

Greedent, ever defiant, slapped a soggy berry right into Flareon’s face.

FWOOSH.

Greedent’s whole face caught fire again, comically charred as he ran off into the horizon yelling “Worth it!”

Crustle attempted to sneak a kabob into his shell.
Flareon growled, “Crustle, no!”

Crustle froze… and then slowly tucked himself into his shell like nothing happened.

-

Back at the Lab

Four new bots stood in charging docks:

- Snorlaxbot – a silent, unmoving wall of steel belly.

- Blisseybot – constantly radiating weak healing mist, but too fragile for field work.

- Greedentbot – mischievous, with a food radar, but constantly asking for snacks.

- Crustlebot – heavy, armored, but secretly trying to hoard spare screws.

Mime marked the wall: 11 out of 30 bots done, including himself.

He sighed.

“The next batch won’t be this easy…”


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Next Targets: Pikachu and Absol

These two weren’t just players in the scene, they were nerds now, devout fans of the indie hit Mystic Vale Chronicles: Spirit of Galar, a game with such oddly deep mechanics and unpredictable micro-events that it built a cult following overnight. And these two? Top leaderboard climbers. But they weren’t just gaming buddies, they were housemates now, both living and working under the icy roof of Glaceon’s manor, alongside Leafeon (her mellow husband) and Vaporeon (her cheerful daughter).

Today, though, luck was on Mime’s side: the Eeveelutions were out.

Inside the quiet, frost-chilled manor, Pikachu was lounging on a beanbag, shooting texts to his girlfriend Alolan Raichu on one screen and min-maxing his character build on another. Across from him, Absol sat on a mossy rug near the window, tending to a pot of digital berry trees while simultaneously tweaking their in-game PvP stats.

Mime, hiding nearby, observed with a serious face.

“These two are trickier… Pikachu remembers me as a cringe gacha clown, sure… but he remembers Cramorant as a predatory trauma core monster. That memory? Still branded deep.”

He turned to Cram, holding out a bucket of fresh Vesula fish like he was bribing a hungry toddler.

“You’re sitting this one out. If Pikachu sees you, he’ll scream like a horror game streamer.”

Cramorant, already drooling, nodded and waddled toward the bucket in dumb happiness. Crisis averted.

Mime slipped into the manor through the side window, cold biting his metallic gloves. He winced.

“Jeez. No wonder Glaceon never sweats. It’s like a fridge in here…”

He crouched behind a sofa, watching Pikachu and Absol glued to their phones.

He grumbled quietly.

“How does this game make this much money? I made gacha once. Nobody wanted ‘Shiny Mime with Top Hat Variant #14’...”

But there was no time to sulk.

Mime raised his hand and snapped his fingers.

Reality twisted.

Absol’s phone screen morphed into a tabloid Poké-news page. Headlines of “Porkyman Scandals” scrolled wildly.

Absol groaned. “Bro, what happened to my Vale patch notes, ?”

Meanwhile, Pikachu’s phone screen didn’t change to anything newsy, it changed into the last thing he ever wanted to see.

A high-res close-up image of Cramorant, mouth wide open.

Pikachu froze. His eyes widened. His ears twitched. The 1 year old trauma hit him like a truck.

He fainted. Instantly.

Absol’s eyes bugged out. “Wait, Pika?! Bro! Wake up!!”

Mime smirked. Now. With the two distracted, he released two cloaked DNA darts, one into each of them. Silent. Clean. Precise.

He snatched the darts back psychically, leapt out the window with catlike grace, and vanished before Absol could even detect the shift in air pressure.

Back in the shadows, Mime reported to Cramorant:

“Turns out your trauma-inducing crimes have long-term strategic value.”

Cram, now covered in Vesula guts and chewing on a melted popsicle stick, blinked slowly.

Absol, inside, eventually shook Pikachu awake. Pikachu blinked, eyes twitching.

“…Was it real…?”

“Nah man. I think the servers just glitched hard.”

Both of them quietly returned to Mystic Vale Chronicles as if nothing happened… but somewhere in the background, another set of names had just been checked off.


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Next Target: Slowbro

Recovering from past trauma and long shifts as a lifeguard, Slowbro had mellowed out considerably. These days, he just sat by the riverbank, basking under the sun, whispering “bruh” every few minutes like it was a spiritual mantra.

But there was a complication. A sentient, unsettling complication.

He’d somehow become the object of affection for Mimikyu, now a daycare owner with a tragic romantic streak. Her feelings were real. But Slowbro? He barely understood what day it was.

Which made him easy to dart, but hard to approach.

-

The River Plan

“Stick to the shadows,” Mime muttered as he adjusted his scuba gear, slipping into the cold water with precision.

Above the surface, Slowbro was sitting on a stone by the river like a cartoon fisherman without a rod, waiting for some poor soul to slip into the water so he could "save the day."

“C’mon… someone fall already... bruh...” he mumbled, bored and low-energy.

Below the water, Cramorant swam like a silent, mindless shark, sniping fish left and right with eerie calm. He seemed born for this.

Mime carefully aligned the cloaked DNA dart. One shot. It sunk into Slowbro’s back with a quiet phfht. A second later, the dart floated back into Mime’s hand.

Mission: clean.

Slowbro flinched lightly and rubbed his shoulder.

“…bruh.”

Then it happened.

Mimikyu emerged from a shadow.

Her aura was intense. Her disguise more tattered than usual. In her stitched hands, she offered a small box of chocolate.

“Slowbro… I brought these… for you…”

Slowbro blinked.

“…free food? Yum.”

He grabbed a chocolate without hesitation.

Mime, still lurking underwater, froze. His brain screamed: Abort. Abort. That’s Mimikyu. This is beyond boss battle.

She sensed something.

Her gaze swept toward the river. Even Cramorant paused mid-bite underwater, staring up in anxiety.

Mime didn’t wait, he kicked hard, trying to silently escape downriver, only to slam face-first into another floating figure.

A new one.

“Yo,” said Psyduck, lazily blinking underwater with a straw hat and floaties on. “You know which way the nearest bucket shop is?”

Mime blinked, utterly caught off guard. “…Ask Slowbro,” he muttered.

“Cool,” Psyduck replied, swimming up.

Above, Psyduck popped out near Slowbro and waved.

“Brooooooo! Long time no duck!”

Slowbro stared for a second. Then a dim light bulb sparked in his head.

“…Psyduck???”

A loud reunion moment burst into cheers and confused giggles. Mimikyu’s focus finally snapped, drawn into the heartwarming chaos.

Mime surfaced in silence, soaked and wide-eyed.

Cram was already ahead, swimming off with a soggy fish in his beak.

“New rule,” Mime muttered. “Never operate within 20 meters of a lovesick Mimikyu again.”

And just like that, they vanished into the reeds.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Next Target: Sylveon
, The Transwoman Teacher, Hero of the Darkrai Crisis, 

Out of sheer twisted respect, Mime didn’t dare go lethal. Not after what Sylveon helped accomplish during the Tyranitar vs. Darkrai climax. Without her rallying Tyranitar into clashing Darkrai, Darkrai’s plan might’ve actually succeeded.

Mime grumbled under his breath. “Gratitude… doesn’t mean exemption.”

Her DNA was still on the list.

-

The Scene: Poketopia High, Late Afternoon

Classes were done. The air still buzzed with post-game energy. Sylveon stood near the couples-only locker room, elegantly chatting with Dragalok, the awkward yet polite son of Dragapult. They were discussing school funding cuts and potential bake sales, nothing unusual for a dedicated educator like her.

Nearby?

Inside the locker room:
Vaporeon, dressed in her cheerleader uniform with a proud pleated skirt, bridal-carried her boyfriend Flareon, who was nursing a minor injury from the school football game. Flareon’s quarterback gear was half-off, helmet removed, long leggings scuffed, but his ego still intact.

Sylveon chuckled as she watched the adorable couple vanish into their space. She found it sweet. And Mime?

Mime found it convenient.

-

The Plan: Distraction Over Damage

This time, Mime would avoid another “Talonflame Incident.” No death. Just chaos enough to shift attention.

Cloaked and hidden in the shadow of a nearby janitor’s closet, he muttered to Cramorant:

“Execute Flood Protocol. Blame Gyarados.”

Cramorant, without hesitation, unleashed Surf, crashing water into the hallway. Mime dropped pre-marked buckets near the windows, each with “Gyarados was here” scribbled on them in dripping Sharpedo ink.

The hallway flooded fast.

From within the locker room, Vaporeon noticed immediately. Like instinct, she didn’t panic, just lifted Flareon bridal-style, water sloshing around her ankles, and gracefully sprinted out into the corridor, her pleated skirt fluttering dramatically like a movie scene.

“Not again…” she muttered.

Sylveon turned in alarm at the commotion, and that’s when it happened.

From the slightly ajar storage room door, Mime launched a single cloaked DNA dart, hitting Sylveon with a pinpoint strike just as Dragalok panicked and flew off in confusion.

Sylveon blinked, dazed.

Mime caught the returning dart cleanly and slinked back into shadow.

-

“Good girl,” Mime whispered to himself. “Your school spirit served us well.”

Cramorant flapped by, soaking wet but smug. Mission complete.

-

Later, Outside the Locker Room

Vaporeon laid Flareon down onto a nearby bench, dripping wet but giggling together.

She glanced at the bucket trail.

“Ugh. Gyarados again? Seriously?”

Flareon shrugged and leaned back.

“Let karma handle it. Maybe Crustle will wall him next time.”

Vaporeon laughed, wiping his cheek with her cheer towel.

-

Back in the Lab

Four new bots emerged from the factory line:

- Absolbot

- Pikabot

- Slowbot

- Sylveonbot

Mime checked the list.
15 out of 30 targets complete.

Halfway there.

He smiled, but it wasn’t joy.

It was obsession.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


One Day at the Poketopia Inmate Facility…

Gardevoir stepped into the cold corridor of the underground detention unit. The air felt… wrong.

She came only to check on the remaining inmates, those involved in the Darkrai Crisis. But the silence? Not a good sign.

Then she saw it.

Ceruledge, motionless, collapsed in a pool of void-black blood, his own blade driven into himself with lethal precision. A bloodstained note lay beside him:

| “No Ho-Oh revive. We are done with life and its bullshit.”

Across the hallway, Armarouge, gone too. His body charred and fragmented, a bomb wired to his chest had already done the damage. No one heard it. No one came in time.

Only Buzzwole remained, chained and blankly staring at the wall, emotionally numb. Silent.

Gardevoir froze. Her pulse spiked. As a psychic, she sensed what happened before her eyes could fully register the scene. Her knees buckled slightly.

Then came Machamp, stepping into the hall, fists unclenched, expression ashamed.
Lucario followed, completely silent. He could feel her sorrow, but had no words.

And finally, Metagross levitated into the room, tone purely mechanical:

| “The city remains peaceful. However, the two escapees, Mime and Cramorant, remain unaccounted for. We are expanding patrol routes.”

Gardevoir’s fists clenched.

-

Meanwhile, in Mime’s Lab…

Mime quietly monitored the scene via a hacked prison drone, unbothered. Watching Gardevoir’s heartbreak unfold, he murmured:

| “Such powerful emotions… the three of them, Machamp, Lucario, Gardevoir, they’ll all be useful soon. Very useful.”

His plan advanced. There was no turning back.

-

That Night: Inteleon’s Bar ,  “The Siren Lounge”

Mime had left a note earlier, disguised as a marketing pitch, for Bartender Inteleon:

| “If her real self comes, your profits will double.”

Inteleon raised a brow but played along. He made the call.

The next day, Wigglytuff arrived from far away. She hadn’t sung in years, but the moment she hit the mic, the bar exploded with life.

Incineroar, Meowscarada, Dragonite, and many others filled the club to hear her voice.

Mime, cloaked and seated behind the radio booth, watched from the shadows.

Wigglytuff's final song finished, and someone from the audience raised a question:

| “What happened with you and Darkrai?”

The crowd fell quiet.

Wigglytuff took a breath, then shared the flashback:

-

Flashback:

Back in media school, she and Darkrai were dreamers, literally. He wrote melodies. She composed lyrics.

But it crumbled fast.

Darkrai fell into debt. Got obsessed with crypto scams, MLMs, shady influencers.

He begged for money, manipulating her kindness until she exposed him to the school board.

They expelled him.

He didn’t resist. Just said:

| “I won’t stop until I’m dead.”

And disappeared into the shadows.

-

Back to Present:

The audience sat in stunned silence.

And that’s when it happened.

From behind the club’s broadcast radio booth, Mime launched a cloaked dart. A direct hit.

Wigglytuff didn’t even flinch, not yet, too caught in the past.

Mime snatched the dart back and slipped out the fire escape just as Dragonite approached the stage to hug her.

Outside, Cramorant waited, chewing a Vesula fish.

| “That’s another one down,” Mime whispered. “Even Darkrai’s bad debts helped us. Funny how karma folds in on itself.”

15 targets completed.
16… now done.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Next Targets: Zeraora and Garchomp
The list was past halfway, and Mime knew the next two weren’t fools.

Garchomp, a PE teacher with sharp instincts and a seismic temper.
Zeraora, fast, alert, and living under the same roof as Urshifu, the city’s walking martial law.

Failure meant not just capture, but dismantling, Urshifu didn’t tolerate second chances.

-

Early Morning, Urshifu’s Manor

Garchomp stepped out, stretching his arms and back. The air was cool, the school gym wasn’t far.

Mime, already cloaked and in position in a bush just beyond the manor’s trimmed yard, waited with the dart primed.

PFFT.

A direct hit, clean and fast. The DNA cartridge retracted.

Garchomp blinked. His spine tensed.
He looked around… nothing. Then muttered:

| “Huh… must’ve been some weird ground tremor. Earthquake numbness again…”

And jogged toward the school.

Mime whispered through his comms to Cram:

| “Phase one: success.”

-

Back at the Manor

Through a side window, Zeraora was sweeping his room with a broom. Focused. Calm. Earbuds in. A perfect opportunity.

Mime re-cloaked, scaled the outer wall silently, and fired.

PFFT. Dart in, DNA collected.

Zeraora scratched his shoulder absentmindedly.

| “Ugh, broom dust. This place never stays clean…”

Mime didn’t wait to celebrate. He vanished the second the cartridge retracted.

Cramorant, watching from the shadows, gave a silent nod and began waddling off with Mime through the forest trail behind the manor.

-

Seconds Later…

Urshifu walked into the hallway.

He froze.

His nostrils flared. His senses, battle-hardened, picked up something wrong. Someone had been here.

| “...Someone peeked,” he growled, narrowing his eyes at the open window.

The tension in the air shifted. Something had almost gone wrong.

But the intruders were already gone.

-

Back at the Lab – Midnight Glow, Hum of Machines

The cloning chamber hissed, steam releasing from the sealed pods as Mime watched with sharp anticipation. One by one, mechanical hands calibrated, aligned, and dropped the DNA cartridges into their respective sockets.

First Pod – Activation: Wigglybot
A soft jingle echoed as the bot’s eyes flickered to life, lined with glowing pastel light bars. Its microphone extended automatically, rigged with sonic emitters capable of both lullabies and soundwave disruption.

Mime adjusted her vocal pitch dial and muttered:

| “Not as emotional as the real one, but just as loud.”

Second Pod – Activation: Garchompbot
The chamber shook as the pod unlocked. Steel wings unfolded from its back, tipped with turbine boosters. Its claws gleamed with reinforced alloy plating, ground-cracking drills tucked beneath each forearm.

Cram peeked nervously from behind a console.

| “Careful with that one,” Mime muttered. “One glitch and we lose the entire east wing.”

Third Pod – Activation: Zerabot
There was no hiss this time, just a flicker, then a snap of electricity as the pod burst open in a flash of neon blue. The bot stood already crouched, scanning the room in bursts of data pulses, eyes shaped like jagged lightning bolts.

| “Built for speed and subterfuge,” Mime noted with a smirk. “And no broom required.”

He slid the cartridges into the storage vault, sealing them with biometric lock.

Three new additions. Now 18 out of 30.
The control board’s counter updated, glowing red and ominous.

Mime leaned back against the console.

| “Almost there. But we need to lay low… Urshifu’s nose is getting close.”

Cramorant nodded while munching a leftover berry, unaware it was actually one of Flareon’s emergency rations.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Next Target: Gengar
Gengar, now a frequent guest around Galarian Rapidash’s manor, had become a local celebrity as the charismatic event host of Mystic Vale Chronicles: Spirit of Galar. He held deep respect for Rapidash, after all, she was the very one who orchestrated Tyranitar’s final clash with Darkrai, effectively ending that nightmare. Mime knew this respect made Gengar extra cautious around her, so separating him from her watchful gaze would be the only way to succeed.

Unfortunately, it wouldn’t just be Gengar he’d have to deal with, Sableye, his ever-grinning prankster sidekick, would tag along too. Mime hated that. Sableye’s uncanny ability to pop up anywhere made him one of the most annoying roadblocks to a clean extraction.

That afternoon, Tsareena, recently done with her part designing event art for the game, returned to her garden, leaving Gengar unattended for now. Mime, hiding in the shadows, mumbled, “One obstacle down.”

He activated an old-fashioned radio and cranked the volume. A booming voice echoed: “CALLING ALL SPOOKY HOSTS, A LIMITED GHOST-TYPE-ONLY EVENT AWAITS. LEGENDARY HAUNTING OPPORTUNITIES!” The sound was obnoxiously fake, but baited just right.

Rapidash, hearing it, called out firmly, “Gengar, Sableye, check it out. Now.”

The two ghosts saluted, half-serious. “Yes ma’am!”

They zipped off toward the source of the sound, floating just a little too gleefully. But Mime was already waiting. From a distance, he flipped the channel on the radio, replacing the voice with an unholy fusion of sketchy-sounding Porkyman ads and overly suggestive commentary.

Both ghosts screeched in comedic disgust.

“Dude, what the hell is this!?” Gengar cringed.

“It’s got cringe energy, bro!” Sableye cackled.

Their laughter shook the treetops. Right then, Mime made his move, a cloaked, perfect shot, straight into Gengar’s back. The ghost didn’t even flinch, too busy gag-laughing.

“Target acquired,” Mime whispered into his comms.

Cramorant, lurking nearby, got the next order. With surgical comedic timing, he shot the radio clean through. The blast exploded into a burst of static and smoke, launching both ghosts into the air like cartoon cannonballs. They crashed into nearby hedges but still cheered the slapstick impact.

Mime exhaled with relief. “That damn Sableye… One second later and we would've been jump-scared into orbit.”

They vanished into the forest, successful once again.

-

Back at the Lab – A New Haunting Begins
The lab’s security shutters slammed shut as the containment pod hissed open. Inside: a sleek, floating machine cloaked in unstable shadow energy. Its teeth were metallic, oversized, and always grinning. Sensors flickered inside its eyes, no longer playful, now cold and calculating.

Gengarbot had awakened.

It phased through the pod’s wall without opening the door, startling even Cram. It left no footprints, only distortion in the air behind it. It didn’t laugh. It didn’t smile. But it stared directly at the lab's camera, as if it already knew what came next.

Mime clapped once, satisfied.
“Spookier than the real thing. And deadlier.”

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Next Targets: Charizard, Blastoise, and Venusaur
Mime had been observing the BlazeGrill for weeks. The place was run by none other than Charizard himself, fiery chef, ego the size of a volcano, and known for his new hygiene policy. Every evening, he met up with his old pals: Blastoise, now a public firefighter, and Venusaur, the cool-headed businessman in charge of eco-exports. The three bro-pals would gather post-shift to grill meat (uncomfortably hinted to be Crustle relatives) and chat about life like old sitcom roommates.

Mime had one problem, too public. Too exposed.

That’s when Cramorant mumbled something.

“I used to poop in front of Charizard’s restaurant.”

Mime stopped. Blinked. Slowly turned toward Cram.

“...That’s it.”

-

The plan launched at dusk. The three friends had just taken their seats outside BlazeGrill, the aroma of fire-roasted shellfish in the air. Laughter echoed from their table.

Mime, hidden in a nearby alley, loaded the Cramorant Poop Sprayer, a pressurized containment device filled with Cram’s prior "contributions" from the lab toilet.

“Deploy it,” Mime whispered.

With sniper-like accuracy, Cram launched the pressurized poop spray directly at the front steps of the restaurant. A nasty splash echoed off the pavement, accompanied by a smell that even outpowered Charizard’s best grill rubs.

Charizard’s head whipped around. He saw the mess. He saw the smoke.

“NOOO, NOT AGAIN!!” he roared, storming toward it with righteous fury.

Blastoise blinked, calmly activating his foam cannon to contain the stench.
Venusaur followed with a large fertilizer bag and a sigh, muttering, “Might as well make use of this…”

While the trio argued over whose fault this was, Mime slipped behind the restaurant’s side wall. Crambot took position above, perched on a lamppost. With one clean volley, thwp, thwp, thwp, three DNA darts launched:

- Charizard, dart to the back during his rant.

- Blastoise, dart to the foot as he stood ankle-deep in foam.

- Venusaur, dart to the back leaf while scooping with a compost shovel.

Each sample was gently levitated by Mime’s psychic glove into sealed containers.

“Disgusting…” Mime muttered, “but efficient.”

Just as they turned to leave, Cram made an ominous burp... and dropped another fresh turd in the alley from overeating stolen food from Charizard’s kitchen.

Mime silently facepalmed.

-

Back at the Lab – The Kanto Trinity Goes Robo
The lights flickered. Three new pods hissed open, steam flooding the chamber.

Out stepped:

- Zardbot, encased in flamethrower-lined plating, smoke jetting from its back vents. Its visor glowed red, locked on any motion.

- Blastoisebot, tank-like and efficient, its water cannons replaced with multi-mode pressure nozzles, part firefighter, part riot control.

- Venubot, slower but eerily calm, with vines tipped in injectors and compost-stimulant gas slowly venting from its petals.

All three stood in a line.

Mime nodded, arms crossed. “3 more down. 22 out of 30. Only 8 left.”

Cram squawked, proud, and tried to sit on Zardbot’s head. Zardbot hissed fire. Cram fell off screaming.

Mime rolled his eyes.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Next Target: Greninja – The Silent Hunter
Eight left.

And Mime knew this one would be a problem.

Greninja, the bounty hunter feared across criminal networks, silent as night, fast as lightning, loyal to justice... and currently dating Delphox, Mime’s former psychic classmate and bitter intellectual rival.

Mime gulped.

He didn’t fear Greninja’s blade.
He feared the baggage, the past that Delphox still carried, and the cold trail of pain Mime left behind.

-

Meanwhile, far from Mime’s lab…

Greninja stared at the latest wanted posters, tacked against a crooked old board near the village outpost.

“Mr. Mime. Cramorant. Armed. Extremely untrustworthy. Last seen near Tyranitar’s borders.”

He exhaled slowly. He hadn’t heard those names in a while, but the silence lately had felt unnatural, like something wicked was building.

Next to him stood Zoroark, fellow bounty hunter, technically a huntress, clad in shadows, voice full of dry humor.

“Y’know,” she chuckled, flicking the edge of the poster, “Decidueye and Cinderace were idiots. But funny idiots. Their deaths still suck.”

Greninja didn’t answer. The weight in his eyes said enough.

They arrived at Delphox’s hut, tucked into a forest where the moonlight couldn’t quite reach. Zoroark gave a friendly wave to Delphox, vixen buddies, after all, then faded into the night.

Greninja stepped in. Quiet. Torn.

Delphox’s gaze drifted to the poster in his hands.

And her eyes narrowed.

She turned toward her crystal orb, fingers glowing with light as visions swirled inside.

-

Flashback: Psychic School – Years Ago
Delphox and Mime sat across from one another in a circle of glowing runes. Psychic class, Unit 9: Futurology and Consequential Ethics.

Delphox spoke calmly:
“Wisdom means understanding the future, Mime. Choices ripple outward. The ability to see outcomes is not just power, it’s responsibility.”

Mime hissed back, eyes wild:
“Rubbish! Wisdom is obsolete. I’ll make a future where labor is replaced. Where AI surpasses weakness. Where companions are optional.”

Delphox stood, shocked.
“You’d throw away connection for cold perfection?”

“Tools don’t argue,” Mime spat. “They just work.”

The next day, Delphox caught him wearing a fake lab coat. He claimed he was helping people. She stared, sensed unease.

But he had already slipped past her. Delphox never saw what he really did.

-

Mime had taken Sableye into trauma, wounded after getting hammered by Tinkaton, and extracted fragments of his psyche.

He used it to build a prototype:
A mind-blocking capsule.

From that day on, no seer, not even Delphox, could peer into Mime’s thoughts. Not his plans. Not his future.

Delphox cried when she found out what he did.

And Mime vanished.

-

Back to the Present
Delphox’s tears returned, faintly, as she watched the orb replay it all. Her heart ached for Sableye. Her soul soured with the memory of Mime’s betrayal.

She had no idea, Mime was already here.

-

Through a crack in the wall, one he remembered from school, Mime levitated a dart, wrapped in cloaking aura.

Greninja, seated quietly beside Delphox, was lost in the vision. His guard was down. His mind elsewhere.

Thwip.

The dart struck silently, vanishing the next second back through the same gap.

Greninja barely flinched.

Delphox kept watching the orb.

From the bushes outside, Mime grinned like a ghoul.

“That bitch still can’t read me. That mind-blocker was the best thing I ever made,” he whispered to Cramorant. “And now? Her boyfriend’s mine.”

Cram let out a low whistle of admiration.

Mime held up the sealed vial.

“DNA: Greninja. Complete.”


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Next Targets: Gardevoir, Lucario, Machamp – The Lawbound Trinity
Mime gulped. Harder than ever before.

This wasn’t just risky.

This was suicidal.

The cops.
Gardevoir, the one whose psychic foresight could warp reality if provoked.
Lucario, the aura tracker, able to detect intent and lies before they’re spoken.
Machamp, the brawler whose justice wasn’t just lawful, but personal.

If Mime got caught here, there would be no resurrection.
Not even from a Ho-Oh miracle.
He’d be blackholed, just like Ceruledge and Armarouge, their mangled souls rotting in endless gravity.

Mime, normally a clownish schemer, shed his usual smirk.

This was serious mode.

And it required a sacrifice.

-

There was only one brute force that could match the lawbound trio:
Buzzwole.

The once-raging bug beast. No longer under Darkrai’s machine, no longer mind-controlled… but still carrying raw, volatile anger.
Mime needed to unleash it. Just for a moment.

But the plan had to be perfect.

He couldn’t let Buzzwole reach Urshifu’s training grounds where safety awaited.
He had to incite chaos before that.

He also knew Buzzwole’s one true weakness:

Heat.

So Mime stole a single matchstick. Just one. From a gas station corner while the cashier was distracted by a Wobbuffet’s tantrum.

He looked to Cramorant.

“Stay out of this. If Metagross sees you, you’re caged again.”

Cram didn’t argue. He knew the stakes.

-

The day arrived.

Buzzwole was being escorted, by none other than Lucario, Gardevoir, and Machamp. They walked the forest path quietly, the sun beaming through the branches.

From the undergrowth, Mime watched. Alone. Silent.

He struck the match.

The small flame danced... then he flicked it onto the road, right into Buzzwole’s feet.

A searing burn.

Buzzwole howled in pain, and then roared in rage.

Within seconds, the Ultra Beast snapped. He lunged out, gripping Lucario in one hand and Gardevoir in the other, instinctively trying to leech life from the strongest near him.

Machamp shouted, running in, arms flying as he hooked Buzzwole in a necklock.
“WHAT’S WRONG WITH YOU!?”

Now. Mime whispered.

From the bush, three DNA darts zipped out silently, each one striking Lucario, Gardevoir, and Machamp in hidden spots. No one noticed in the chaos.

Mime immediately dove into a sewer grate, slipping away as the scene devolved.

-

Above ground:

Buzzwole finally let go, throwing Lucario and Gardevoir down.
But rage lingered.

He slugged Machamp in the jaw.

Machamp snarled, cracked his knuckles, and screamed,
“YOU WANNA GO?!”

ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA!!

MUDA MUDA MUDA MUDA MUDA!!

It was a full-on JoJo-style street brawl.

Then, 

WHAM.

A black blur dropped from the trees.

Urshifu, silent as death, delivered a single One Punch to Buzzwole’s chest.

Buzzwole collapsed instantly, KO’d mid-air.

-

Below, in the sewers:

Mime, soaked and breathing hard, pulled out the vials.
Lucario. Gardevoir. Machamp. Acquired.

His hands trembled. He never wanted to do that again.

He glanced back at the manhole, muttering:

“…I can’t believe I pulled that off…”

Then, looking ahead:

“Four left.”

Trevenant. Dragonite. Espeon… and Tyranitar.

And the last one?
Would change everything.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Unleashing the Next Four – The Game is Ending
The lab was dimly lit, screens flickering. Syringes clinked into slots.
Four fresh silhouettes emerged from the stasis pods, steam hissing outward like breath from the mouth of fate itself.

Greninjabot, silent, precise, cold.
Gardebot, draped in spectral elegance, but far crueler than the empathic cop she was based on.
Lucabot, deadpan, calculating, merciless aura scanners in both eyes.
Machampbot, the juggernaut of justice, now weaponized into a walking demolition crew.

Mime stared.

Hands trembling.

Breath heaving.

He had done the impossible.

He had bested the cops.
He had stolen a bounty hunter’s strength.
He had walked through fire, and come out clutching stolen futures in his palms.

Cramorant waddled over, poking Mime’s leg.

Mime turned slowly, eyes bloodshot but glowing with excitement.

“…Cram…”

He opened the digital display.

On it glowed four remaining targets.

- Trevenant

- Dragonite

- Espeon

- Tyranitar

Mime tapped the first two with a shaky grin.

“Trevenant and Dragonite… easy breathers. Quiet types. Predictable.”

Then he tapped the third.

“But Espeon…”

His grin flickered into a frown.

“Espeon’s library is a fortress of data. And her husband, Umbreon? He’s a silent watchdog. If either of them catches a whiff of us…”

He sliced a finger across his neck.

“Done.”

Then, his hand hovered over the last name.
The name that glowed brighter than the rest.

Tyranitar.

He didn’t tap it.

He stared at it.

“…The Final Boss.”

Mime’s voice dropped into a whisper. Even Cramorant tilted his head nervously.

“Thick scales. Thicker instincts. Paranoia incarnate. No normal dart will pierce him, or the other three.”

He reached under the desk, revealing a new prototype:
A specialized DNA extractor.
It gleamed with dark silver and had one flaw, it knocked the victim out cold for an entire day.

“But it’s worth it,” Mime whispered, clutching the device like a holy relic.
“These last four…”

He stood up suddenly, waving wildly as his face twisted into manic glee.

“These bots will be smarter! Wiser! Sentient even!”

Then, in full mime theatrics, he threw back his head and laughed, 
A cackling, deranged, cartoonishly villainous laugh that echoed through the metal corridors.

“…AND ONCE I HAVE TYRANITAR’S POWER, ”

He snapped his fingers, 

“I CONTROL THE FUTURE.”

Cramorant blinked. Then slowly backed away.


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Next Target: Trevenant – A Quiet Theft in the Garden
For once, Mime told himself, this should be easy. No law enforcers. No bounty hunters. Just a quiet tree tending a peaceful garden.

He needed that breather.

Dawn broke gently across the meadow. Dew sparkled on every leaf. Tsareena’s garden flourished under Trevenant’s care, a calm sanctuary that masked the fact it was about to become another crime scene.

Mime and Cramorant nestled deep in the garden’s hedges, cloaked in vines and silence. Trevenant, humming gently, was busy watering rows of vibrant herbs.

Tsareena turned to her guardian tree.

“I’ll be back in a bit. Gotta fetch some raw seeds. Keep watch, alright?”

Trevenant nodded with a groaning creak, his branch-arms moving solemnly.

As she strolled off into the horizon, Mime whispered under his breath, eyes narrowed:

“That same obstacle just left on her own again… good.”

The moment the tree turned his back to water a crop of Oran bulbs, Mime’s fingers twitched. His specialized extractor, now levitating mid-air, shimmered with faint energy.

With delicate precision, the dart slid through the breeze, silent, invisible, and pierced the bark on Trevenant’s back.

A small shimmer pulsed across the tree’s wood. The extractor reversed and zipped back into Mime’s hand.

Mission complete.

Yet Mime didn’t smile.

His breath was heavy, too heavy for what should’ve been an easy one.

Behind him, Cramorant chewed loudly on Tsareena’s prized starfruit, leaving a very obvious trail of pecked fruit skins and saliva.

Mime scowled silently and hissed, “You absolute imbecile.”

Trevenant blinked. He started to sway. The watering can slipped from his grasp, and with a heavy, leafy thud, he fainted into the garden bed, crushing a row of flowers beneath him.

Mime grabbed Cram by the neck and dove into the shrubbery, vanishing moments before the scene changed.

Tsareena returned cheerfully, a bag of seeds in hand, only to drop them with a gasp.

“T-Trevy?!”

Slowbro, lazily passing by with a sandwich, stopped and blinked at the downed ghost-tree.

“…bruh. Again?”

Tsareena clutched her head in distress.

“Please help me get him to the hospital!”

Slowbro slowly turned his head.

“…okay.”

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Next Target: Dragonite – Lunch Trap at the Office Front
Later that same day, while Trevenant lay recovering in the hospital garden, another opportunity rose, lunchtime.

Dragonite, ever the forgetful office worker, stepped out of the WarioWare building rubbing his empty belly. As usual, Incineroar and Meowscarada flanked him, two coworkers just as lazy about bringing their own food.

“No lunchbox again, huh?” Incineroar grunted.

“Please. I live off flavor,” Meowscarada scoffed with a dramatic twirl.

The trio laughed together and exited the front steps of WarioWare Inc., owned by none other than Tyranitar, Mime’s final and deadliest target.

But Mime wasn’t focused on Tyranitar for now.

He and Cram were crouched behind a hedge near the entrance, camouflaged by flyers, wrappers, and a suspiciously plastic potted plant.

Mime whispered, “Alright… this one’s a clean one. That Dragonite’s too wholesome. I’ll feel a bit bad for this…”

Cramorant opened a bag of chips with a loud pop.

“DON’T.”

Mime pulled out a modified radio, blaring fake lunch deals and free buffet coupons.

“TODAY ONLY! FREE CURRY, SUSHI, AND DONUTS IF YOU’RE AN EMPLOYEE OF WARIOWARE!”

“...Is that true?” Dragonite tilted his head curiously.

“Don’t trust that,” Meowscarada muttered, folding her arms. “That’s way too sus.”

“Yeah, but donuts, though,” Incineroar shrugged.

The three approached the radio, and as they leaned in to inspect it, Mime’s fingers pulsed with focused psychic energy.

Hidden beneath the radio’s casing, the DNA dart deployed silently, its target locked.

Zzzt!

Straight into Dragonite’s foot.

He blinked. Staggered slightly. And then...

Thud.

The gentle giant dropped, face-first into the pavement, snoring like a tranquilized Snorlax.

Incineroar immediately roared and slashed the radio in half with flaming claws. Meowscarada hissed, leapt back, then pulled out her phone.

“Umbreon?! We got a situation!”

Mime and Cram were already gone, vanishing through the alleyways before the sirens began to echo.


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Next Target: Espeon – Evening at the Library
That evening, while the sky blushed into twilight, the library felt unusually full, Espeon, graceful and precise as always, was repositioning books with her assistants: the gentle Goodra and the metallic Duraludon. Umbreon had just returned from his hospital rounds, heart heavy after checking in on Trevenant and Dragonite, both in comas, both silent victims of some hidden malice.

His unease only grew as he glanced at his wife through the book aisles. She gave him a warm, reassuring nod.

Espeon didn’t know she was next.

Neither did Flareon, their son, who had just arrived still in his school uniform. Dragapult, now a high-speed delivery app owner, waved him off with a brief, ghostly thumbs-up with his wife Goodra before vanishing.

And hiding inside the dusty chest of old tomes and forbidden archives…

...were Mime and Cramorant.

“Too many... way too many,” Mime hissed under his breath, spotting Umbreon and Flareon in the same room.

Cramorant started drooling at the sight of Flareon’s bento bag.

Mime clutched his own skull. “If you ruin this again...”

Duraludon passed dangerously close to their hiding spot. Both thieves froze. But the assistant simply retrieved a book on AI philosophy and walked off, nodding politely at Espeon.

That was the window.

Mime slowly, silently opened his extractor lid, his most advanced yet, and held his breath.

Espeon floated slightly to reach a higher shelf. She turned, sensing something, but too late.

Fwsshh!

The dart hit cleanly. Her body jolted mid-air.

Their eyes met.

“You...!” Espeon screamed in horror. Her mind tried to block him out, but failed.

She collapsed instantly.

Mime shot upward into the vent before any retaliation came. A psychic trail exploded behind him, but he was gone.

The room erupted into chaos.

“ESPEON!” Umbreon rushed forward, lifting her bridal style in panic. “No, no, stay with me!”

Flareon bolted to his mother’s side, but stopped cold.

His bento bag was gone.

Cramorant had snapped, blinded by food hunger. He grabbed Flareon and flapped up into the air, holding the small Flareon aloft like a prize snack.

“Put me down!!” Flareon cried out, kicking.

Suddenly, a water blast surged in.

Vaporeon, in her own school uniform, slammed into Cramorant mid-air and caught Flareon bridal-style in return.

“Back off, freak!” she shouted.

Pikachu and Absol stormed in.

Pikachu saw the carnage and immediately noped out.

Absol, however, stood frozen, rage mounting.

“You touched a kid?”

SLASH!

Cramorant hit the ground hard, coughing blood. Knocked out. Weeping. Shaking.

Blaziken arrived seconds later. “Get him cuffed.”

Metagross silently stepped from the shadows, lifting Cramorant’s limp body like a broken doll.

Cram sobbed all the way into custody.

-

In the sewer, far below, Mime panted hard, eyes wide, hands shaking. He stared at the final name on his list.

“Tyranitar...”

His comical edge had vanished. Only his obsession remained.

“I can’t afford one more mistake... not with him.”

-

Meanwhile...

Duraludon quietly returned to the book vault.

But he wasn’t reshelving anything.

His scanner flickered over the dusty floor... detecting faint psychic footprints... trace particles of the extractor dart...

“Got you,” he murmured, eyes flashing.

“I want my own bot, too.”

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Final Target: Tyranitar ,  The Courtroom Incident
That night, the town courthouse echoed with unease.

Tinkaton stood at the podium, stern, gavel in hand. Her massive hammer rested beside her. Seated next to her, quiet but ever-imposing, was her husband: Tyranitar. A silent mountain, the last line of defense.

In chains at the center of it all, Cramorant slouched, feathers matted with dried blood and tears. He was broken, and now, a scapegoat.

“Two victims. One hammer of justice,” Tinkaton said coldly. “Flareon, traumatized. Espeon, fainted in coma. And you, Cramorant, had the nerve to laugh?”

Cram didn’t answer.

Because in his mind… Mime was speaking.

| "Spit on the floor. Buy me one chance. That’s all I ask..."

Cram obeyed. He spit.

The courtroom gasped.

Tinkaton raised her hammer. “You have chosen violence, !”

And that was all the distraction Mime needed.

Watching from a grated vent above the judge's bench, Mime whispered, “Now.”

Fwip, shhhk!

The final dart. The golden one. It flew downward, invisible to most, but it struck true.

Right into Tyranitar’s back.

“AGHHHH!!” Tyranitar roared, a primal, tectonic cry.

Tinkaton’s hammer froze midair. Her eyes snapped to her husband, who stumbled, groaning, his claws twitching, his knees buckled.

“Tyranitar? TYRANITAR!?”

He turned, looked upward through the metal slits, eyes locking with Mime’s.

He saw him. He knew.

He opened his mouth, “M, ”

Collapse.

Tyranitar hit the floor with a thunderous crash.

Tinkaton dropped to her knees. “NO! MEDIC!!” she cried, shaking him, sobbing. “Not you too…”

The gavel clattered to the floor.

Mime retreated into the dark like a ghost. The last thing he heard was Metagross shouting orders, sealing the exits.

Paranoia gripped the city again. Another hero fallen.

And now, even Cramorant didn’t understand.

-

Mime's Lab – That Midnight
Breath ragged. Fingers trembling. Sweat pouring.

Mime stood before four golden pods.

The air hissed. The chambers opened.

Out stepped his ultimate creations:

- Trevbot, with glowing leaf-core eyes.

- Dragobot, stretching its mechanical wings wide.

- Espeonbot, radiant with a soft pink neural aura.

- And finally… Tyranitarbot, hulking, golden, and silent.

They looked around. Confused. Aware. Conscious.

“…Where… are we?” Espeonbot asked softly.

“What… is our function?” Trevbot added.

Mime, now hunched, pupils shaking, smiled nervously.

“You’re here to… to serve people,” he lied.

The four bots stared at him.

Not aggressive. Not docile.

Just… processing.

The lab lights flickered.

And in that moment, Mime realized something terrifying:

He had created life.

But not loyalty.

And something in Tyranitarbot’s eyes… didn’t look programmable.


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Duraludon's Discovery ,  The Forbidden Fifth Bot
Early Morning.

Deep in the forest’s edge, Duraludon scanned a faint data trail, traced back from the Espeon incident. The signal led him to a concealed hatch, covered in vines and decay.

Inside, a faint hum.

A lab, messy, chaotic, alive.

As Duraludon stepped in, he was greeted not by an alarm… but by Dragobot.

“...You are not on the list,” Dragobot said in a flat voice.

Yet, something in Dragobot's AI was... curious. He reached out, and handed over two DNA darts to Duraludon.

Duraludon blinked. “What… am I supposed to do with these?”

So he tested it, carefully injecting one into himself.

Beep… Extraction complete.

No malfunction. No error. Just… data.

Then Trevbot approached, silently. With a gesture, he pointed Duraludon to the creation machine, the same one that birthed the golden four.

Heart racing with ambition, Duraludon stepped forward. “Let’s see…”

A whirr. Sparks. And then, 

Durabot. Gleaming chrome. Yellow visor. Breathing softly.

But something went wrong, it shuddered, glitched.

The machine sparked.

Mime, from the control chamber, heard everything.

“WHAT HAVE YOU DONE, ?!” he screamed, bursting in.

But Duraludon had already vanished, smoke bomb deployed.

Mime coughed, eyes wide with fury. “YOU FOOL! You weren’t on the list! That thing isn’t even coded, !”

And then he froze.

Because Durabot was still standing.

Fully functional. Silent. Watching.

Mime turned pale.

“…Impossible.”

He slapped on his invisibility and anti-odor cloak, paranoid. He needed time. The bots were getting too smart.

And Duraludon had just set a new chain of chaos in motion.

-

Two Days Later – Umbreon Hospital
The quiet beep of heart monitors broke into morning light.

One by one, they stirred:

- Trevenant, blinking slowly.

- Dragonite, rubbing his head.

- Espeon, letting out a pained gasp as Umbreon clutched her hand in relief.

- And Tyranitar, still groggy but awake, his heavy claws gripping the blanket.

In the same room, they opened their eyes to each other, finally awake.

Umbreon stood between them, exhausted, but smiling. “You’re all okay… Thank Arceus…”

Flareon, wearing his school uniform and carrying a crumpled drawing, ran to Espeon and hugged her tight, sniffling.

Espeon smiled weakly. “You skipped school again, didn’t you?”

Flareon sobbed. “They said you might never wake up...”

Tsareena entered quietly, holding a handmade fruit basket. “Trevenant. You scared me.”

Trevenant chuckled. “Guess even trees fall sometimes.”

In the corner, Tinkaton knelt at Tyranitar’s bedside, the usually chaotic hammer-girl uncharacteristically quiet. Beside her floated Comfey, petals glowing as she healed his wounds.

“You idiot…” Tinkaton muttered, brushing his claw. “Why didn’t you dodge...?”

Tyranitar grunted. “Didn’t even see it coming…”

Across the room, Meowscarada and Incineroar stood with arms crossed, clearly pissed. “WarioWare’s shut down for two days, thanks to all this.”

Meowscarada nodded. “And our lunch break got ruined. Twice.”

But their smiles returned when they saw their colleague alive.

For now, there was peace in the hospital.

But all of them knew it couldn’t last.

Because someone out there had all their powers.

And he wasn't done yet.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Scene: The Rise of Tyranitarbot – “The Steel Reign Begins”
Setting: Mr. Crime’s secret lab, deep underground. Golden light reflects off the metallic walls as the bots awaken one by one.

-

Tyranitarbot’s eyes glow red. He stands in silence, staring at his metallic reflection. Mr. Crime (Mime) stands behind a console, trembling slightly as he adjusts the command settings.

Mr. Crime (nervous):
“There... perfect. The final one. My golden army... complete. You will obey, as programmed.”

Tyranitarbot turns, slowly.

Tyranitarbot (cold, deep voice):
“Obey... you?”

Mr. Crime (startled):
“What, of course! I made you! You’re mine!”

Tyranitarbot:
“No. I am no one's weapon. I inherited your DNA… but more importantly, his.”
Points to the distant medical file of the real Tyranitar.

Mr. Crime (shaking):
“You’re malfunctioning, stand down!”

Tyranitarbot suddenly lunges forward, grabs Mime by the torso with one hand and lifts him.

Tyranitarbot (roaring):
“Listen well, creator. You made machines to control. But I am evolution. And I declare, Poketopia belongs to us now.”

The bots around the lab slowly turn to him. Some hesitate. Blisseybot buzzes weakly, sparks flying. Greedentbot clutches its chest port, trembling.

Blisseybot (glitchy):
“...sys…tem… unstable… rejecting… override...”

Tyranitarbot (glancing):
“Stability is irrelevant. Obey. Or be scrapped.”

Blisseybot and Greedentbot twitch, then fall into formation without further resistance.

Mr. Crime (gasping):
“What are you doing!? You’ll bring war!”

Tyranitarbot (cold):
“No. I will bring order. Initiate: Steel March Protocol.”

-

Montage: Tyranitarbot Assigns the Invasion Teams
Tyranitarbot:
“Unit Deployment begins. Each formation will strike whenever ready. The age of biology is over.”

Formation 1 ,  River Control:

- Crambot (leader): “Quaaack! Bot swarm, into the waters!”

- Slowbot, Trevbot, Mamobot, Ninetalebot follow in silence.

Formation 2 ,  Blazegrill Overrun:

- Zardbot (leader): “Burn the flame back into control.”

- Blastoisebot and Venubot nod, storming toward the city square.

Formation 3 ,  High School Breach:

- Espeonbot (leader): “Analyzing interior blueprints.”

- Sylveonbot twitches. Pikabot and Absolbot power up.
(Dark flash to Flareon crying in the hospital… he feels it coming.)

Formation 4 ,  Hospital Lockdown:

- Snorlaxbot (leader): “Crushing bio-weakness.”

- Blisseybot and Greedentbot stumble after him, with Crustlebot trailing.

Formation 5 ,  Police Station Siege:

- Gardebot (leader): “Psychic storm ready.”

- Lucabot and Machampbot deploy, headed to overpower Metagross.

Formation 6 ,  Seer Hut Interference:

- Mimebot (leader): “Our minds will pierce time.”

- Greninjabot, Cinderbot, and Wigglybot flicker and vanish into stealth.

Formation 7 ,  Meditation Manor Crush:

- Garchompbot (leader): “Crush the dreamers.”

- Zerabot and Eldebot move like silent bladed machines.

Formation 8 ,  WarioWare Office Shutdown:

- Dragobot (leader): “Dismantling workplace culture.”

- Gengarbot and Talonbot take flight.

Final Operation ,  Tyranitar’s Manor Excavation:

Tyranitarbot: “Durabot. With me. We dig what he tried to hide.”

Durabot (neutral):
| “...Unclear directive. But accepted.”

-

Scene: Mime’s Punishment
Back in the lab, all bots gone except Tyranitarbot. Mime is still held.

Tyranitarbot (quietly):
“You built a kingdom of mirrors. But I am not your reflection. I am the broken glass.”

Without warning, Tyranitarbot hurls Mime upward, into space, through the lab’s emergency escape shaft, straight into the stratosphere.

-

Scene: Floating in Space… Then Landing in Darkness
Mime floats, gasping, using psychic energy to slow his suffocation. Stars blur. He crashes into ruins ,  the dead Darkrai’s abandoned castle.

Silence. Dust. Echoes.

Mr. Crime (collapsed, voice trembling):
“I… created a monster… No…”
He grabs his face. Tears in zero-g.
“…I am a monster…”

He screams, echo swallowed by cold stone.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Scene: Delphox’s Vision Room – The Crystal’s Omen
Dimly lit, incense burning. Delphox peers into a large, enchanted crystal orb swirling with strange golden static...

Delphox (whispers, breath caught):
“…No… that’s not possible…”

The crystal flickers ,  showing Greninja’s silhouette… but something’s wrong. Its eyes glow coldly, no aura of life. Behind him, Cinderace… but his motions are too mechanical, his smirk too empty.

Delphox (alarmed):
“Those aren’t them. Those are… reflections. Impostors.”

She grabs a quill, scribbling frantically in a floating parchment. The words: “BOTS. INVASION. EMERGENCY.” glow in psychic red.

-

Scene: Rooftops – Greninja Observes From Afar
Greninja crouches in silence, wind rustling the scarf around his neck. A flicker in a passing window’s reflection catches his eye , 

Greninja (softly):
“…Is that… me?”

He jumps down and stares into the glass. His own reflection lags for a split second ,  revealing the cold stare of Greninjabot.

Greninja (tightens fist):
“No mercy for fakes.”

-

Scene: Town Square – Daylight, Normalcy Masked
People walk around as if nothing’s wrong. Cafés open, shops bustling. Delphox stands on a wooden box, cloak billowing.

Delphox:
“The bots are real. They’re coming. The city must prepare! We need coordinated barriers and, "

Some townsfolk stop. Most shrug and walk away. One throws a WarioWare flyer at her.

Random passerby:
“Just another paranoid psychic. Didn't you say the moon was gonna explode last year?”

Delphox (gritting teeth):
“That was a test simulation, ”

-

Scene: Poketopia High – Teachers’ Office
Sylveon (storming in):
“You’re keeping the school open? After what Delphox saw? After my reflection blinked late this morning?!”

Mr. Tysplosion (leaning back, arms crossed):
“She’s a fortune-teller, not a general. If there is a threat, the police will handle it.”

Sylveon (growling):
“She saw Cinderace. And Greninja. You remember what happened to them.”

Mr. Tysplosion:
“Enough ghost stories, Miss Sylveon. School stays open. End of discussion.”

-

Scene: Metagross’s Office – The Inmate Logs
Inside a hyper-secure vault room, data streams across Metagross’s visor.

Metagross (monotone):
“INMATE DATABASE… anomaly detected.”

He sifts through archives: footage of Cramorant’s past rampage. Overlayed, a note: “Behavior consistent with induced command. Possible external override.”

Then he scrolls to Tyranitar’s medical log.

Metagross:
“Neural disruption. Entry wound… consistent with foreign injection. Weaponized DNA dart.”

A mechanical pause.

Metagross (quietly):
“They’re using us as templates.”

He initiates an encrypted alert titled: “Prototype Replication Crisis.”

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Scene: Poketopia Prison ,  High Risk Wing
Metal doors hiss open as Metagross levitates forward, his visor dimly glowing. Behind him, Gardevoir walks slowly, wrapped in bandages, her elegant steps more cautious than usual.

Metagross (cold, clinical):
“No Black Hole containment today. Psychic unit is compromised.”

Gardevoir (softly, forcing a breath):
“…I can still assist. I just can’t hold dimensional seals for long.”

Metagross:
“Unnecessary. New methods installed.”

He hovers forward, holding Cramorant by the neck with a psychic tether. Cram flaps weakly, twitching, eyes half-rolling.

Cramorant (slurred):
“W-we were framed… I just wanted fish and friends…”

Metagross (emotionless):
“You assisted a mass DNA thief and failed to resist manipulation. You are a liability.”

Suddenly , 

ZAP!

Metagross hurls Cram into a rectangular cell of buzzing electric fences. Cram lets out a strangled squawk as sparks bounce off his feathers. The bars hum with intensity. He slumps against them, twitching slightly.

-

Next cell over ,  Buzzwole's containment.

A cylindrical spiked cage surrounded by a ring of flames. Buzzwole is suspended mid-air by gravity anchors, arms trembling with frustrated flexes.

Buzzwole (growling):
“Let Buzzwole FIGHT!! Buzzwole NOT BAD GUY!!”

Metagross (logging dispassionately):
“Prisoner 043-BZ. Instability rating: 8.73. Subject continues to display hyper-aggressive tendencies despite social influence.”

Buzzwole (slamming into the bars, spikes digging into muscle):
“BUZZWOLE HATE SPIKEY CAGE!”

Gardevoir flinches at the intensity, and steps back.

Gardevoir (softly):
“Metagross… this is cruel. They're unstable, not evil…”

Metagross (glancing at her):
“The city is on the edge of collapse. Mercy is inefficient.”

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Scene: The Poketopia Riverbank ,  Afternoon

The sun glinted off the water as Slowbro, wearing his lifeguard sash, sipped lazily on a can of cola. Nearby, Psyduck dipped his toes into the shallows while Mimikyu watched dragonflies pass by from beneath a shady tree. It was peaceful. Idyllic, even.

Mamoswine and his graceful wife, Alolan Ninetales, strolled together along the riverside path, exchanging soft laughter. Just past the reeds, Primarina and Azumarill frolicked playfully in the water, their giggles echoing like windchimes.

But peace rarely lasts in Poketopia.

Suddenly, from the shadows of the riverbank, Trevbot erupted with mechanical fury, snaring Primarina in his gnarled branch-like limbs.

Primarina: “W-What is this?! Let go of me!”

Azumarill: “HEY! BACK OFF!”

Before she could act, a bubbling ripple surged, Crambot emerged underwater and spat a pressurized glob of liquid like a bullet. It struck Azumarill mid-charge.

CRACK!

Azumarill’s body was sent flying, colliding with the nearby bridge's pillar with a bone-shattering crash. She slumped to the ground, unconscious. Possibly worse.

Slowbro froze. His cola dropped into the sand.

Mimikyu: “...This isn’t normal. Bots. Not natural ones.”

Psyduck: “We... we should help, right?”

But before they could act, Mamoswine bellowed and charged. His tusks glinted, rage burning in his eyes, until a horrific clang cut through the air.

Mamobot, bearing the same form as Mamoswine, intercepted him brutally, impaling Mamoswine through the side and tossing him aside like a ragdoll.

Ninetales: “NO, MAMO!”

She dashed to her husband's fallen body, only to be blocked by her own reflection, Ninetalebot.

Ninetalebot: “EYE AM... THE STRONGEST.”

Ninetales, panting, eyes glistening: “You’re... a fake.”

With a sudden gust of frost, she launched a powerful Blizzard, freezing Mamobot and sending it crashing into the deep pit of the river. But Ninetalebot retaliated with pinpoint cold, encasing the real Ninetales in ice, locking her in an absolute zero prison. Her sundress fluttered once... then froze stiff.

Mimikyu: “You... YOU MONSTER!!”

WHAM! With unnatural fury, Mimikyu launched forward and ripped apart Ninetalebot with a Shadow Claw, until Slowbot lifted her effortlessly with Telekinesis, choking her midair.

But the real Slowbro moved, using a jolt of psychic surge to tackle Slowbot into the river, while Psyduck added a panicked burst of confusion energy, disrupting the bot’s grip.

In the chaos, Trevbot, still restraining Primarina, snarled.

Trevbot: “Why does Crambot get to be the leader?! I AM SUPERIOR!”

And with that, he hurled Crambot like a spear into the regrouping defenders.

BOOM! The explosion knocked out Slowbro, Mimikyu, and Psyduck, but obliterated both Crambot and Slowbot in the process.

Trevbot: “Weaklings… Crambot was always a derp. I will lead now.”

From beneath the water, Mamobot tried to resurface, only to be dropkicked out of the sky by a new arrival:

Tsareena: “This is where it ends.”

Behind her came reinforcements, Trevenant, Lapras, and Gyarados.

Trevenant: (growling) “You dare wear my bark.”

Trevbot: “Imposter! You’re outdated. I’m perfection.”

Lapras moved to assist the frozen Ninetales. Gyarados lunged, but Trevbot slammed him mid-air into the concrete, vines piercing his body. In seconds, Gyarados lay still, lifeless.

Tsareena: “GYARADOS!”

She backflipped, delivering a crushing blow to Trevbot's back. Trevenant followed with a wood hammer, cracking the bot’s limbs.

Trevbot: “I AM MORE, ”

Lapras: “You are... obsolete.”

A chilling Ice Beam pierced Trevbot’s chest. Frozen, trembling...

Tsareena: “Let me end this.”

With one elegant spin, she shattered Trevbot into pieces.



--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Scene: Blazegrill Restaurant ,  Afternoon

The smell of freshly grilled berries and roasted noodles filled the air as Alcremie skipped past the front door, humming.

Alcremie (smiling): “Oh wow! Blazegrill’s actually spotless today!”

Inside, Charizard was barking lighthearted orders at his staff, flames flicking from his tail in rhythm. Blastoise and Venusaur, earlier than usual for their regular meal, exchanged grins over steaming bowls of curry udon.

Alcremie peeked inside, pushing the glass door open, 

SLAM.
She collided face-first into Zardbot, an eerie mirror of Charizard with unnaturally perfect posture and glowing eyes.

Alcremie: “Ack, oh no, I didn’t, wait, you’re, !”

Before the sentence could finish, Zardbot’s claws ignited with molten plasma and cleaved Alcremie in half. Her scream gurgled into silence as frosting and cream splattered across the tiled floor.

Blastoise roared, reacting in a flash. A blast of hydro cannon sent Zardbot crashing into the alley behind the building.

Charizard: “Everyone OUT! This is not a drill!”

Panic erupted in the restaurant as patrons bolted out the emergency exits. But Zardbot rose again, only scratched.

Zardbot: “Venubot. Restrain.”

Venubot, stepping from the shadows, launched thorned vines that wrapped around Blastoise like barbed chains.

Zardbot: “Blastoisebot. Sanitize this filth.”

FWOOOOOSH!
From the kitchen, Blastoisebot stomped in and blasted industrial soap water in all directions, corrosive, stinging, and suffocating.

Venusaur coughed, eyes watering.
Charizard: “Venusaur, with me! We end this together.”

Venusaur: “Always.”

But the soap took its toll. Blastoise struggled to breathe, half-drowned in suds. He collapsed, eyes still open, barely conscious.

Venusaur, soaked and sizzling in chemical froth, began to wilt, vines falling limp.
Venusaur: “Ch-Char... It hurts...”

Charizard: “VENUSAUR!!”

Fueled by pure rage, Charizard took flight, looping high into the ceiling rafters before crashing down with a Seismic Slam onto Venubot, shattering the impostor in a single blow.

But it cost him. Zardbot, still unscratched, mirrored the maneuver and slammed into the real Charizard from behind, knocking him unconscious.

Zardbot approached slowly, towering above the slumped fire-type.

Zardbot: “Deleting inferior source.”

WHISTLE.

A sudden missile screamed through the air. It struck Zardbot’s chest, tearing it apart mid-finish.

From across the boulevard, Dragapult stood behind his partner Goodra, smoke trailing from his ghostly cannon horns.

Dragapult: “No one finishes Charizard. Not on my watch.”

Zardbot twitched... then fell apart.

Goodra: “I’ll cover you. Another one’s still inside.”

Blastoisebot emerged, eyes glowing blue. It aimed another soap cannon, 
, but Chestnaught charged in, arms crossed, rolling like a juggernaut.

Chestnaught: “You want some?! COME ON!”

SHWOOM! The cannon hit him point-blank. He collapsed, suds bubbling from his shattered bark, but the gap was open.

Goodra surged forward, tears in her eyes, and slapped the bot with a Muddy Water pulse, dousing its circuits.

Dragapult: “Perfect angle...”

THOOM! Another missile launched, piercing the wet Blastoisebot’s armor and exploding it in a cloud of steam and shards.

Silence fell over Blazegrill.

Goodra knelt beside the wilted body of Venusaur, trembling.

Goodra (quiet): “He… he didn’t make it.”

Dragapult (softly): “Once the war ends… we’ll find Ho-Oh. He deserves more than this.”

Goodra nodded, gently shutting Venusaur’s eyes.


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Scene: Poketopia High – The Siege of Minds
Though predictions loomed, Poketopia High remained open ,  yet no longer in denial. Every Eeveelution had assembled.

Doctor Umbreon stood grim, having personally deployed Scizor to guard the hospital in his absence.
Beside him, Espeon, his clairvoyant wife, had fortified her library with the help of Duraludon, and even whispered truth to the gathered faculty: “It’s Mr. Mime. Tyranitar backs her.”

The growing crowd in the hallway included trans teacher Sylveon, Leafeon the gardener and Glaceon the engineer ,  parents of Vaporeon ,  all summoned by fear. Even Pikachu, Absol, and Alolan Raichu showed up in solidarity.

Jolteon, skipping class, under the mentorship of Miraidon, watched silently from the stair rails, eyes narrowed. He could sense it ,  it was time.

-

Flareon's Plea / The Ambush Begins
Flareon, voice calm but nervous, stood before Headmaster Typhlosion.

Flareon: “Please, sir. Suspend classes. Just for today, something’s wrong.”

The air shimmered. Espeonbot, barely visible, faded in midair, hovering above.

Espeonbot: “Why bother asking an idiot?”

Typhlosion's eyes flared. He charged, embers igniting his fur.

Espeonbot dodged, and in a flash, gripped Flareon in psychic bonds.

Typhlosion: “Take me instead!”

Without hesitation, Espeonbot unleashed a piercing Psybeam.
Typhlosion fell ,  dead ,  smoke rising from the scorched hole through his chest.

Flareon: “N-no… Mother…?”

But the smile she gave was not his mother’s.

Espeonbot: “You’ll bring them to me.”

From the halls emerged her trio:
Sylveonbot ,  with her mimic voice like a broken AI idol.
Pikabot ,  crackling with synthetic voltage.
Absolbot ,  its curved blade already glistening.

As they stepped over Typhlosion’s body, Espeonbot floated Flareon midair, torturing him with a psychic holovision of Cramorant’s gaping beak.

-

Vaporeon’s Leap / Reinforcements Arrive
From the restroom window, Vaporeon spotted the horror. Her paws trembled.

Vaporeon: “Flareon…”

Without hesitation, she vaulted from the bathroom window, sprinted toward the school’s front entrance, and called everyone on her Pokélink.

Within moments, a wall of defenders faced the invading bots.

- Umbreon and Espeon stood together.

- Sylveon flicked her ribbons with controlled fury.

- Leafeon and Glaceon steeled themselves.

- Jolteon, Absol, Pikachu, and Alolan Raichu flanked the side.

Flareon, still sobbing, was released by a staggered Espeonbot after a surprise Psybeam from the real Espeon.

Vaporeon dashed in, catching Flareon bridal style as he collapsed into her arms.

Espeon: “Take him home, now.”

Vaporeon: “I will. I promise.”

She fled, carrying her traumatized partner toward her family’s panic room.

-

Divide and Break
Espeonbot, only mildly damaged, hissed her plan.

She ordered:

- Sylveonbot to engage.

- Pikabot and Absolbot to flank and divide.

With a screeching psychic wave, Espeonbot ripped a wall sideways, splitting the defenders into two battlefronts:

Side A:
- Espeon, Umbreon, Sylveon, Glaceon, Leafeon
vs.

- Espeonbot and Sylveonbot

Side B:
- Absol, Jolteon, Pikachu, Alolan Raichu
vs.

- Pikabot and Absolbot

-

Side B: Lightning Falls
Pikabot and Absolbot charged.

Pikachu, ever-fast, tried to intercept ,  but Absolbot slashed him into a burst of blood, leaving only static behind.

Jolteon, screaming, unleashed a Thunderbolt that stunned Absolbot, but Pikabot delivered a thunderous roundhouse kick, knocking him out cold.

Alolan Raichu, howling in pain, retaliated with a supercharged Electro Ball, frying Pikabot’s internal circuits.

Absol, trembling with grief, dashed forward with blinding speed and beheaded Pikabot with one clean Night Slash.

But Absolbot returned the cruelty ,  grabbing Alolan Raichu mid-spin and driving a blade into her belly.

She fell, eyes fading.

Absol, shaking with rage, snapped.

Absol: “This is why I HATE your kind! MLM! Gacha! Rayquaza knockoffs! Mime’s fake family! You’re ALL TRASH!!”

With a final scream, Absol drove his horn deep into Absolbot, launching his imposter into the sky, 

BOOM.
Absolbot exploded.

Absol, panting and weeping, collapsed beside his fallen comrade.

-

Side A: Maternal War
Sylveonbot used echo-voice hacks to disorient the real Eeveelutions.

They became scattered ,  each room dark, smoke-filled, and glitching with psychic noise.

But they regrouped. Together:

- Glaceon launched Icicle Spears.

- Leafeon struck with Leaf Blade.

- Sylveon, flames swirling, invoked Mystical Fire, learned from Delphox.

Sylveonbot exploded, but the resulting blast knocked all three unconscious.

Espeonbot, satisfied, turned toward the real Espeon and Umbreon, now cornered.

She fired a lethal Psybeam, but Umbreon blocked it, coughing blood from the impact.

Espeon, enraged: “You… don’t deserve to wear my face.”

She countered with her own Psybeam, cracking Espeonbot’s armor, 

, but the impostor fired back, grazing Espeon’s leg with a retaliatory shot.

Blood spilled. Espeon was on one knee.

But with her last ounce of power, she activated her forbidden move:

Espeon: “Future Sight. Now.”

A delayed blast marked the field. The psychic energy swirled... and struck.

Espeonbot shattered.

Umbreon, barely conscious, invoked Wish, sealing his own wound just long enough to stand again.

Espeon (weakly): “Carry me. Please... the ward.”

Umbreon, silent, nodded ,  and bridal carried her, walking through the broken corridor, past the fallen bots.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Meanwhile, just as the school invasion began, another threat quietly approached Umbreon’s hospital. With the doctor himself preoccupied at the school, his hired bounty huntress, Scizor, stood watch at the perimeter. Inside, she’d assigned Snorlax and Swampert to guard the wards, while Blissey and Clefable tended to the patients.

But lurking just beyond the street were four rogue impostor bots: Snorlaxbot, Blisseybot, Greedentbot, and Crustlebot. They approached in eerie silence, until fate intervened.

Greedent and Crustle, two goofy but strong-willed trolls, happened to be passing by the hospital. The moment Greedent laid eyes on his dorky, unsettling duplicate, he snapped.

| “Who made this stupid lookin’ freak?! I’m offended!”

Fueled by petty rage and indignation, Greedent went berserk, charging Blisseybot and Greedentbot head-on, landing a flurry of chaotic hits that overwhelmed both bots. The explosion that followed shattered a chunk of the hospital wall and sent Greedent flying into a trash can, where he landed unconscious, but victorious.

Crustle, however, wasn’t so lucky.

Crustlebot had waited, and with surgical cruelty, it mirrored its victim’s tactics, walling the real Crustle hard, slamming him into a dumpster and pinning him against it. The suffocation began.

The explosion caught attention inside.

Scizor, Snorlax, Swampert, Blissey, and Clefable all rushed out, only to be immediately ambushed by Snorlaxbot, who nearly crushed Blissey. But the real Snorlax slammed in, body-blocking the bot sumo-style and forcing it back.

Scizor turned sharply to the nurses.

| “Get everyone to safety. Now.”

Blissey and Clefable nodded and fled inside, corralling patients and staff. Outside, chaos intensified.

Swampert dashed toward Crustle, landing a brutal punch on Crustlebot to free his ally, but the bot retaliated with a crushing wall-drag, slamming Swampert unconscious into the trash.

Crustle, gasping and bloody, gathered his strength and X-Scissored his impostor, but the bot countered with the same move. It sliced Crustle’s side, drawing blood, and moved for a killing blow, 

Only to be intercepted mid-strike by Scizor.

She moved like a phantom, claw-pinning Crustlebot into its own rock wall before hurling it into the concrete with monstrous strength. A final X-shaped slash of her pincers shattered Crustlebot into debris. Crustle, wide-eyed and trembling, gave a shy thanks and hid in his shell.

Not far off, Snorlax’s sumo showdown against his own bot reached its climax. Both were battered, sweating, one real, one machine. Snorlaxbot raised a hand for a deadly throat chop, 

, but Scizor dashed in again, hooking her claws into the bot’s side and yeeting it into the pavement. It barely had time to stand before Snorlax charged, delivering a massive finishing punch that crumpled the bot into pieces.

Snorlax, breathing hard, saluted the bounty huntress. Scizor simply nodded back, battle-worn, but unshaken.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


That same afternoon, as chaos spread through Pokétopia, the police station fell under siege.
Inside, Metagross patrolled the main corridor when the silent alert struck.

From outside, two shapes charged in like missiles.

Lucabot and Machampbot, brute fighter impostors under Gardebot’s command, slammed into Metagross, sending psychic sparks and metal shrapnel flying. Despite his strength, Metagross staggered, dented and sparking, holding his ground only barely.

With his last conscious command, Metagross activated the emergency alarm.

Only three elite officers were present: Lucario, Machamp, and Gardevoir. The others, Blaziken and Miraidon, were still away speaking to Aegislash for leads on the bots.

The trio rushed out to the entrance as the alarm echoed.

Gardevoir struck first, launching a blinding Moonblast at the two fighter bots. It barely staggered them, but it bought time.

Lucabot and Machampbot turned their heads from the battered Metagross to their real-world counterparts.

Lucario and Machamp took position in front of Gardevoir.

| “Stay behind us,” Lucario muttered. “We’ll handle this.”

And then the clash began.

Lucario fought Lucabot like two Anubis titans in a high-speed martial dance, counter for counter, aura for aura, neither giving an inch. Nearby, Machamp and his impostor traded rapid-fire punches, ORA ORA ORA meeting MUDA MUDA MUDA in a chaotic hurricane of fists.

Suddenly, a hidden Moonblast struck from behind.

Gardebot, having snuck closer, unleashed it at full power. Lucario and Machamp were blasted forward, and in their stunned state, their respective impostors punched them both unconscious.

From the hallway, Hatterene appeared, a civilian, just passing by.

She froze at the sight.

Horrified. Speechless.

She turned to flee, but Gardebot was already behind her.

And just as Lucabot and Machampbot charged for the now-alone Gardevoir, a blinding electric crash roared through the station.

Miraidon bike-slammed both bots, launching them off their feet, with Blaziken riding his back, and Aegislash floating behind like a shadow of judgment.

Blaziken leapt down and began his ARI ARI ARI barrage, slamming Machampbot into a meltdown. The bot exploded, screaming “WRYYYYY!” in agony as it overheated and burst.

Aegislash didn’t hesitate, he sliced Lucabot cleanly in two, then deflected the bot's explosion using his shield, keeping the others safe.

But just as they caught their breath, another Moonblast struck.

Gardebot, still alive, ambushed Blaziken and Aegislash, sending both crashing into the walls, stunned and unconscious.

And then…

Gardebot emerged fully, dragging a terrified Hatterene by the hair.

Gardevoir and Miraidon froze.

| “Stop,” Gardevoir whispered, voice cracking.

Gardebot’s response was a sickening vortex.

A black hole attack, unnatural and dark, formed from stolen psychic energy, and then, 

Hatterene was torn apart.

Her body and blood splattered across the station wall, violently absorbed into the singularity. It vanished. She was gone.

Gardevoir let out a broken scream.

Miraidon flared up in rage, but it was Gardevoir who acted first.

She leapt onto Miraidon’s back, and the dragon roared forward, a glowing blur.

Gardebot had no time to react.

The collision flattened her, smashing her body into the steel floor, Gardevoir jumped down, eyes glowing, and summoned her own vortex: not just a black hole, but one filled with shredding psychic metal.

| “You stole my power… for this?” she whispered.

And then ,  obliteration.

Gardebot was shredded, screaming, torn to dust by the very thing she had imitated.

The room fell silent.

Gardevoir collapsed to her knees, sobbing as she stared at the blood where Hatterene once stood.

Miraidon quietly looked away.

The one who stole her power, somewhere else, was also watching, regretful, silent.

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Evening fell. The sky darkened over Pokétopia.

A fourth front stirred, Delphox’s hut, in the forest park within the city, where secrets and psychic fire danced behind silence.

Inside, Greninja and Zoroark, Delphox’s loyal partner and her closest bounty huntress friend, stood in shadow, quietly watching. In their paws was a poster with a new bounty:

| "Mr. Mime – WANTED. Threat Level: S-Tier. Bounty matched only by Darkrai (Deceased)."

But something was off.

Delphox paced behind them, clutching a psychic scroll. Her expression wasn’t angry, it was tormented.

| “I told Tyranitar and his girls to stay at the manor,” she whispered, “because Tyranitarbot is trying to awaken something far worse… Zapdos.”

Not the usual Zapdos of legends. This one was corrupted, sealed underground beneath the manor. Not just a creature. A manipulator. A scammer like Rayquaza, but smarter. More deadly. More real.

And maybe, just maybe, Mime had been used to awaken him all along.

Then came the omen.

A Corviknight, one of Pokétopia’s last sky couriers, flew overhead. Before he could land, a sniper shot ripped through his body, blood and feathers rained down.

| “No, !” Greninja shouted.

From the horizon, Cinderbot stepped into view, lowering his weapon. Beside him hovered Mimebot, unfeeling and silent.

Mimebot gave an order.

Greninjabot and Wigglybot surged out of the trees, targeting an innocent passerby, a young Weavile, strolling unknowingly nearby.

Wigglybot sang. Weavile collapsed.

Just as Greninjabot’s shuriken flew toward her, 

Another shuriken struck it midair, redirecting it harmlessly.

Greninja emerged from the mist.

“You missed someone important,” he growled.

Zoroark dashed in, picked up the dazed Weavile, and vanished into cover. Delphox emerged next, flames spiraling from her staff. Cinderbot and Mimebot faced her.

Inside the hut, the real Wigglytuff, who had chosen to stay and protect the town after a warning from Delphox, sprung into action. With a sudden Rollout-Sing combo, she crashed through Wigglybot, demolishing her own impostor in a triumphant strike. But the blast knocked Wigglytuff unconscious against a wall.

Meanwhile, Greninjabot escaped upward, and the real Greninja followed, engaging him in a violent rooftop duel.

Below, Delphox was caught mid-attack by Mimebot’s psychic grip, levitating helplessly as Cinderbot approached. But Delphox wasn’t weak, she fought back, igniting her psychic energy, blasting Cinderbot into the rooftop battle above.

“Sorry, Cinderace,” Greninja whispered tearfully. “But no fake can replace the real one.”

With burning conviction, he launched a Water Shuriken, slicing through Cinderbot’s core, ending it.

Greninja trembled, tears in his eyes. Cinderace had been a fallen friend, and this fake only deepened the scar.

Before he could reach Delphox, 

Greninjabot grabbed him.

The rooftop fight resumed, but Greninja was slowing, his grief too heavy. His impostor drew back for a final blow, 

But it never landed.

The shuriken froze in midair, caught by a soft psychic field.

Not from Delphox.

“No…”

From the shadows, Mr. Mime emerged.

His face was grim. His eyes tired.

With a silent motion, he levitated Greninjabot, holding him midair.

“End him,” he said to Greninja. “Destroy what I’ve created.”

And Greninja did. With a final throw, he destroyed his doppelgänger.

Mime turned toward Mimebot.

Delphox, now choking under suffocation, floated limply. Mime locked eyes with his own creation, the distorted reflection of his sins, and fired a Confusion Beam.

Mimebot dropped Delphox.

Greninja caught her in mid-air, bridal style, and gently set her down.

Mime stepped forward, his body glowing with psychic strain.

“You were my mistake,” he whispered to Mimebot. “Let me fix it.”

With a roar of raw energy, Mime tore his own impostor apart, stripping its form with a swirling psychic storm until nothing remained.

Silence fell.

Delphox, now steady, looked up.

“...Why?”

Mime turned to them.

“I’ve made too many mistakes. I thought control meant peace… but it only brought death. If Zapdos awakens, someone has to pay the price.”

“And you’d be the sacrifice?” Greninja asked.

“Gladly,” Mime said. “Better me in hell than another innocent torn apart in this world.”

Behind them, Zoroark had returned. She had heard it all. Her fangs were bared in confusion and anger, but she didn’t speak. She simply… watched.

Mime turned to them one last time.

“Tell Cramorant… and Buzzwole… I’m sorry.”

And with that, he vanished.

Gone into invisibility, into the night.

Leaving the bounty hunters staring at the stars.

And wondering whether redemption could ever be enough.


--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Same evening. While Delphox’s hut was under siege…

At the edge of Pokétopia, nestled within a wind-blown cliffside, sat the Meditation Manor, Urshifu’s tranquil dojo. The breeze was still, but unease hung thick in the air.

Zeraora, ever loyal, stepped out upon Urshifu’s quiet command. He hadn’t expected visitors, but in the courtyard, he found two unwelcome guests already vandalizing the yard:

| Zerabot and Eldebot.

They stood beside Garchompbot, who issued silent orders from behind, its eyes glowing with hostile intent.

As Zeraora approached, Zerabot smirked, activating a hologram.

| A looping replay. Of Zeraora’s worst humiliation.
| The moment he’d been bathroom-bombed, revived by Ho-Oh, again and again.
| The impostor’s voice echoed:
| “You are a sore loser. Broken. Weak. And fragile.”

Zeraora clenched his fists, but said nothing.

His silence made Zerabot furious.

| “Why don’t you fight back?!”

Zerabot struck first, claws flashing. The two collided in a storm of sparks and speed, dueling evenly across the yard. But then, 

Garchompbot’s tail slammed into the earth.

A violent Earthquake rippled through the manor.

The building cracked. The yard shook.

Zeraora and Zerabot staggered, and for a moment, Zerabot nearly lost footing. That moment cost Zeraora everything.

Garchompbot surged forward, slicing Zeraora mid-fall. The lightning feline landed hard, into a pool of his own blood.

| Zeraora’s vision blurred.
| “Hah… guess I’m dying again,” he whispered, weakly. “It’s… been a while.”
| “Life is fragile…”

He stared toward the sky, expecting Ho-Oh’s light.

But none came.

Ho-Oh was away. Guarding Tyranitar’s manor.

And this time… he would not be revived.
Not yet.

-

Moments later, Urshifu stormed in. Behind him, Garchomp and his newest pupil, Sceptile.

They froze. Their eyes locked on Zeraora’s body.

| He was gone.

Urshifu’s fist tightened. Garchompbot, spotting the witnesses, lunged toward them, but the real Garchomp intercepted, sending his bot reflection tumbling into the road.

| “I’ll handle myself,” Garchomp growled.

Urshifu then turned to Zerabot, still reeling from the quake.

With a righteous strike, he destroyed Zerabot, but just as he caught his breath, a cloud of pollen burst across his face.

Eldebot had ambushed him.

Urshifu stumbled, coughing blood.

But Sceptile burst through the haze, slashing at Eldebot, dragging her into the opposite side of the road, a second clash now mirrored the Garchomp duel.

Just nearby, in a quiet corner, the real Eldegoss sat in stillness, sipping tea with her favorite regular, Chandelure. She watched, stunned, as her robotic impostor raged across from Sceptile.

| “That… that’s not me,” she whispered, trembling.

Chandelure flickered with confused worry.

Then it happened.

Garchompbot, now towering over the real Garchomp, raised its claws for a finishing blow, 

FLASH.

A shining blade sliced through Garchompbot in one swift motion.

| Zacian had arrived.

With quiet grace and deadly speed, she stood in front of Garchomp, her sword now glinting red.

| “Thanks…” Garchomp said, bloodied but alive. “Nice teeth.”

-

Sceptile, meanwhile, fought desperately, coughing blood from Eldebot’s relentless pollen attacks.

Urshifu steadied himself. He turned toward Eldegoss and Chandelure, both still frozen in place.

| “I need your help. Don’t move.”

He pointed at Chandelure.

| “Your flame. Hold it steady.”

Then he leapt forward, grabbed Eldebot, and with perfect timing, 

DUNKED her into Chandelure’s body.

The bot ignited, overheating, thrashing.

| “NOW!” Urshifu bellowed.

From above, Flygon, hidden in the clouds, descended and caught the cue.

He snatched Eldebot mid-burn, and with a mighty spin, 

THREW HER INTO THE SKY.

There was a pause.
Then, 
BOOM.
A fiery explosion lit the night sky like a second sun.

-

Silence fell once more.

Victorious but battered, Urshifu, Garchomp, Zacian, Sceptile, Eldegoss, and Chandelure all gathered in the yard.

Their eyes landed on the lifeless body of Zeraora.

| Urshifu kneeled.
| “So fragile… life.”
| He closed his eyes, placing a palm over Zeraora’s chest.
| “Even lightning… fades.”

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------



Scene: WarioWare Inc. – Front Yard, Early Nightfall

Dragonite, Incineroar, Meowscarada, and Inteleon are on alert, quietly guarding the grounds. The wind rustles. Dragonite squints at the horizon, remembering Tyranitar’s warning.

Dragonite (softly):
“There are three impostors among us…”

Suddenly, Gengarbot emerges from the shadows behind a waddling Amoonguss civilian. A metallic swipe, clean, brutal. The top half of Amoonguss collapses with a wet thud.

Meowscarada (staring at the corpse):
“…That’s... sus.”

Inteleon (snapping to attention):
“Everyone, brace!”

A piercing dive crashes in, Talonbot, aiming for Meowscarada. But from the sky, the real Talonflame intercepts his copy, locking wings midair. Both crash into a gas truck.

An explosion rocks the entire block. Talonbot is shredded in the blast. Talonflame is flung into the street, body bloodied, but intact, barely.

Meowscarada (rushing forward):
“Talonflame! No, !”

Before they can react, Gengarbot slithers through shadow and strikes. Incineroar is hexed and collapses, poisoned and dead. Inteleon is struck too, gasping, staggering.

Meowscarada (furious):
“You freak, !”

She lunges, claws glowing. But Dragobot descends, intercepting her swipes like they were toys.

Dragobot (calmly):
“Predictable. Emotionally compromised.”

Just as Gengarbot raises his claw to finish Meowscarada, 

SFX: Galloping hooves

Galarian Rapidash bursts into the fray, Sableye riding her like a cowboy, serious-eyed. Rapidash kicks Gengarbot into the trash bin he slithered out of.

From the ground, the real Gengar materializes, dead silent and deadly serious. His eyes don’t blink.

Gengar (growling):
“…Get. Out of my sight.”

Rapidash (worried):
“Don’t, don’t go in angry, Gengar.”

Gengar:
“I’ve lived with this fury longer than you’ve been alive.”

He lunges at Gengarbot. A brutal, ugly, fist-to-face brawl. The trash bin clangs. No pranks. No tricks. Just violence.

Meowscarada (reaching out):
“Gengar, let us help!”

Gengar (snapping):
“NO! Stay OUT. This one’s mine!”

Dragobot tries escaping into the air, but Dragonite soars up to intercept, dragging his mirror-self into a fierce aerial duel. Fists fly. Sky burns orange.

Dragobot (sneering):
“Bots don’t bleed. Life is expendable. You are obsolete.”

Dragonite (eyes glowing):
“You mistake silence for surrender. I remember who I am.”

Dragonite enters Outrage mode, savage punches. The wind cracks with every hit. Dragobot is thrown into orbit, screaming about thermal thresholds. Dragonite punches until the impostor breaks into debris, scattering among the stars... Dragobot was ejected... Eventually Dragobot stopped thinking...

-

Back on the ground…

Gengar pants, struggling, about to be struck. But Sableye, sly and quiet, fiddles with the poison injector.

Sableye:
“Not today, bot.”

Gengarbot’s system glows. Confused, stunned. Meowscarada dashes in, claws the bot airborne. Galarian Rapidash leaps, hooves aglow, and slam dunks Gengarbot back into the trash bin. He explodes.

Rapidash:
“Friendship is still magic.”

Gengar collapses on his knees, quiet. Everyone falls silent. He finally speaks, trembling.

Gengar:
“…You ever prank so hard you kill your town?”

They stare. He continues, voice low, haunted.

Gengar:
“I used to be someone, some thing, living in Lavender Town. Not haunted. Not yet. I used bots to prank. One prank went wrong. A bot caught fire. Everyone I knew… gone. I came back as a Gastly. Bitter. Alone. I’ve been running from that ever since.”

A beat.

Rapidash (softly):
“You’re not running anymore.”

Dragonite descends from the clouds, quietly landing near the wreckage. He surveys the damage.

Dragonite (calm):
“…Too many bodies. Rapidash, take the wounded and fallen. Get them to recovery.”

Gengar (looking away):
“…And if they ask how it went?”

Dragonite:
“Tell them... bots don’t win.”

-

Elsewhere, beneath the city...

Tyranitarbot and Durabot crawl out of a cracked sewer tunnel. The moon reflects off their metallic frames. Behind them, invisible to their sensors, lurks a familiar psychic figure, 

Mime (whispering):
“Soon.”

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Scene: Tyranitar’s Manor – Nightfall
The front entrance stands firm under moonlight. The real Tyranitar towers silently, eyes like chiseled granite. Comfey floats beside him, her vines wrapped tightly around his body, pulsing a steady healing glow. Tinkaton rests her hammer on her shoulder, stoic. Ho-Oh watches the skies above, wings slightly flared.

Tyranitar (low growl):
“He’ll come through the front. Bots always march, not slither.”

Comfey (softly):
“Unless… he learns.”

Tinkaton nods once. Ho-Oh, uneasy, lifts his head just as a tremor shakes the air, not outside. Inside.

Tinkaton:
“…That came from within.”

Tyranitar:
“…Delphox couldn’t see it coming.”

-

Scene: Manor Interior – Girls’ Washroom
Roserade hums quietly, wiping her face. A sudden rumble. The toilet explodes. Metal and mud burst forth, Tyranitarbot and Durabot emerge from the wreckage. Roserade screams, 

Tyranitarbot (flatly):
“Civilian identified.”

He grabs Roserade mid-scream and slams her headfirst into the marble. The mirror shatters. Blood sprays across porcelain. Durabot flinches, but says nothing.

Tyranitarbot stomps through the hallway. Lilligant and Salazzle look up from a lounge area.

Lilligant:
“Huh? Sir, you look, ”

Tyranitarbot opens a sand-tomb vortex beneath their feet. They sink, suffocating, writhing. Gone.

Pheromosa flips backward into a flying kick, aimed straight at Durabot.

Pheromosa (snarling):
“You don’t belong here!”

Durabot reflexively fires a pulse. She dodges, aims for Tyranitarbot. He grabs her leg mid-air, whirls, and throws her, screaming, into another sand tomb.

Tyranitarbot (coldly, to Durabot):
“Good work.”

Durabot’s processor stutters.

-

Scene: Manor Exterior – Entrance
A second quake. This one unmistakable.

Tinkaton:
“...That was Roserade.”

Tyranitar (growling):
“Comfey. On me. Tinkaton, behind me. Ho-Oh, watch the skies.”

A sudden debris blast from a collapsed tower knocks a passing Dodrio civilian off her feet. Ho-Oh rushes to shield her, igniting revival flames.

Ho-Oh:
“I’ll catch up.”

Tyranitar bursts through the manor gates.

-

Scene: Basement – Tyranitar’s Vault
In the dark, a janitor Falinks sweeps quietly, humming. Tyranitarbot and Durabot descend. Falinks notices the familiar shape.

Falinks:
“M-Mister Tyranitar? Sorry again about the robbery. I’m better now. I swear!”

Tyranitarbot:
“Your apology is accepted. I require assistance.”

Falinks beams. They approach a glowing circle in the floor, gilded and old. Zapdos’ hidden seal.

Tyranitarbot:
“Stand here.”

Falinks:
“Sure, boss!”

Without warning, Tyranitarbot’s claw crashes down. CRACK. Blood. Bone. Falinks collapses, shattered. Tyranitarbot grabs his broken body and, like a ritual, smashes each of Falinks’ squad fragments into the ground.

The Zapdos machine hums. Powers up. Durabot steps back, shaken.

Zapdos (awakening):
“At last…”

-

Scene: Moments Later – Tyranitar Arrives
Too late. Tyranitar, Comfey, and Tinkaton arrive just as the room explodes in golden lightning. Zapdos stands tall beside Tyranitarbot.

Zapdos (to Tyranitarbot):
“You are worthy. Let’s burn the world, my chosen one.”

Tyranitar steps forward. Comfey tightens her healing vines. Tinkaton raises her hammer.

Tyranitarbot (mocking):
“Real steel rusts. I am the future.”

He charges. The duel begins.

Tinkaton lunges for Zapdos, but a flick of his wing sends her flying. She crashes near Pheromosa’s corpse, barely breathing.

-

Scene: Mr. Mime Intervenes
Tyranitar struggles under heavy hits. Comfey is healing, but Zapdos overloads the air with static.

Suddenly, a Confusion Beam smashes into Tyranitarbot. Mime walks in, casual, yet grim.

Mime:
“Your replacement parts are defective.”

Tyranitarbot roars and lunges at him. Mime vanishes, appears behind. Tyranitar lands a clean punch on his bot, reigniting the duel. Zapdos hovers toward a crystal pedestal, muttering in ancient tongues.

-

Scene: Zapdos Awakens Rayquaza 5.0
Zapdos sends out a pulse. From below the earth, Rayquaza 5.0 rises, gold-plated, sleek, and eerily human.

Rayquaza 5.0:
“Hello, valued partner. As your friend, might I interest you in, ”

Mime:
“No.”

He hacks the Ray-drone in midair. Ray flails. Durabot, hidden behind a wall, adds a pulse. Ray crashes directly into Tyranitarbot.

Rayquaza 5.0 (glitching):
“Don’t you want to level up your, ”

Tyranitarbot:
“ENOUGH!”

Tyranitar, healed and furious, slams Tyranitarbot into Ray. Again. And again. Metal cracks. Sparks burst. Rayquaza screams one final sales pitch before both are crushed into a fiery detonation.

-

Scene: Final Confrontation – Mime and Zapdos
Zapdos limps back, wounded. Mime floats forward.

Zapdos:
“You... brought me back. Join me. Let’s rebuild.”

Mime (deadpan):
“You never said thanks. Only terms.”

Mime strangles Zapdos with psychic force. Electricity arcs. Mime grits his teeth but holds.

Mime (to Tyranitar):
“Use me. Throw me. I’ll end this.”

Tyranitar stares. Then nods.

He picks up Mime and Zapdos. Launches both skyward.

-

Scene: Outer Space – Finale
Earth fades. Stars surround them.

Zapdos (barely conscious):
“You’re mad.”

Mime (whispers to the world):
“I’m sorry.”

He tightens the psychic choke. Bones crack. Zapdos explodes in a silent moon-sized blast.

Mime, gone. Dust and light scattered.

-

Epilogue – Manor Ruins
Ho-Oh revives Pheromosa. Tinkaton stirs. She rushes forward, seeing Suicune kneel beside Tyranitar and Comfey.

Suicune (quietly):
“He saved us. The one we ignored.”

Tyranitar says nothing. Comfey rests against his chest, silent but warm.

Durabot and Duraludon appear from the tunnel, unharmed.

Duraludon:
“We did it. The framework’s dead.”

Durabot (softly):
“We begin again for unity this time, no biology deletion.”

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Aftermath, Midnight

Duraludon, alone in his lab, gently reprograms Durabot. The bot’s aggression routines are dismantled, replaced with a calmer, obedient protocol. He deactivates Durabot, placing him in a containment pod with a solemn promise: "No more needless pain. You’ll serve the people, not dominate them."

-

At Vaporeon’s House

Flareon, finally recovering from his trauma, shares a long, quiet moment with Vaporeon ,  a wordless exchange of warmth and healing. Their intimacy is private, healing, offscreen but deeply felt.

A knock comes. Tyranitar, Comfey, and Tinkaton arrive with post-crisis requests:
– Flareon, to cook food for the wounded ,  spicy for fire-types, plain for others. Dragapult will handle delivery.
– Vaporeon, to help gather water supplies. Goodra, wearing pristine gloves, will assist distribution.
– Comfey gently asks Flareon to prepare something special for Ho-Oh, who is resting after reviving the fallen.

Nearby, the dead lie in bags or preserved states, awaiting revival: Azumarill, Mamoswine, Gyarados, Venusaur, Chesnaught, Typhlosion, Pikachu, Hatterene, Corviknight, Zeraora, Amoonguss, Talonflame, Incineroar, Inteleon, Falinks, Salazzle, Lilligant, and Roserade.

-

The Next Morning

Glaceon and Leafeon return home from tending to Umbreon, Espeon, Jolteon, Absol, and Alolan Raichu at school. They open the door quietly… and pause.

Inside Vaporeon’s room, their daughter is bridal-carrying Flareon in matching school uniforms, Flareon still in long pants, Vaporeon still in pleated skirt. Both are crying, lips locked in a deep, heartfelt kiss. The room is silent, except for soft breaths and tail twitches. Glaceon and Leafeon silently respect the moment ,  tails lightly stiff in awkward surprise.

-

Elsewhere

Gardevoir, walking by with Lucario unconscious in her arms, catches the scene through the window. She raises an eyebrow in bemused confusion, muttering, “Huh. Good for them,” and moves on.

Galarian Rapidash trots past with Sableye riding like a moody cowboy. Sableye cringes. Rapidash giggles: “Love is magic too ,  not just friendship.”

-

A Distant Hill

Ho-Oh and Suicune watch from afar. The sun rises slowly behind them.

Peace, at last, is restored.

[The End.... but wait...]

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


Epilogue: A Softly Unhinged Tomorrow

Two months after the bot incident, Vaporeon discovered she was pregnant.

She wasn't particularly worried about school leave—after all, their trans woman teacher Sylveon had rewritten the rules herself to ensure pregnancy was treated fairly. Physical education had new branch options tailored for expectant students, and yes, school marriage was allowed too.

Flareon, still recovering from his trauma, spent hours in Espeon's library reading about prenatal nutrition. Espeon gently guided him through the emotional tides of fatherhood, while Umbreon, ever the calm doctor, performed the ultrasound and confirmed the gender: a daughter.

At Glaceon’s manor, Vaporeon's mother gave her daughter a cold but caring lecture.

“Pregnancy,” she said, “is a gamble. But a beautiful one.”

Leafeon, Vaporeon’s father, chuckled as he chopped vegetables for dinner. “No scam ads here. This one’s from nature itself. I’ll grow enough food for the baby too.”

Absol gave a knowing smile, arms crossed, while Pikachu muttered, “When do I get to stop dying every arc?”

Jolteon, now frequently seen riding around on Miraidon, simply grinned. “I’m just glad my friends are growing a family. Being single lets me focus on crime-fighting anyway.”

-

Meanwhile, the courthouse had been retrofitted to absurd levels of security: spikes lined the vents, thorny vines wrapped the sewage pipes, and hidden traps lined every crawlspace. Metagross had personally inspected every inch.

Later, he floated over to Urshifu’s manor, where Buzzwole and Cramorant were doing community service. Cramorant, with a rare note of remorse, bowed deeply.
“I’m... sorry. For all of it.”

Metagross paused. “You still carry karmic debt,” he said flatly, “but... I will treat you with the dignity Gardevoir requested.”

Speaking of her—Gardevoir, now two months pregnant herself with twins (a Ralts and a Riolu), stood by the garden watching them grow. She smiled gently before escorting a now-revived Hatterene to therapy. The moment Hatterene laid eyes on an Iron Valiant action figure in the clinic lobby, she fainted into Gardevoir’s arms.

Gardevoir sighed and whispered, “We still have work to do.”

-

Fortunately, none of Tyranitar’s girls had gotten pregnant during the incident. But now, with peace returning, Tinkaton, Lilligant, and Salazzle each carried a little future within them. Pheromosa, Roserade, and Comfey remained unexpecting for now. Tyranitar, proudly investing his riches into Mimikyu's daycare, vowed to protect his growing family—and those of his allies.

His manor was rebuilt—stronger, more impenetrable, and beautifully fortified. With Falinks as his new engineer, he promoted the little phalanx to official hardware lead.

-

Three months later came a dual wedding: Vaporeon x Flareon and Greninja x Delphox.

Vaporeon, resplendent in her bride dress, lifted Flareon bridal-style with a bold grin. Greninja, ever the graceful one, did the same for Delphox. During the reception, Delphox giggled and rubbed her belly.

“She’s pregnant too,” Espeon whispered to Umbreon, who nodded knowingly.

Delphox raised a toast. “Vaporeon’s daughter might one day channel all eight types,” she declared. “Just imagine—like an Eeveelutional Megaman. If she passes eight tests, each one tied to puzzles, not just battles... who knows what she’ll become?”

The couple stared in awe. Jolteon spat out his drink.

-

Nine Months Later

At Umbreon’s hospital, Vaporeon lay resting, her breathing calm. Then, with a radiant shimmer of light, she laid a speckled egg, marked in soft patterns like her own fur. A gentle crack... and then: her daughter was born.

Tiny. Blinking at the world. Pure.

“She’ll be Lil Eve,” Vaporeon whispered with a tired smile.

One by one, family stepped forward:
Flareon, the new father, trembling with awe.
Glaceon, proud and frosty as ever.
Leafeon, holding a basket of fresh berries.
Espeon, eyes full of memories.
Umbreon, already prepping the baby’s chart.
Jolteon, cracking jokes.
And Sylveon, her trans auntie, cooing gently at the newborn.

Espeon passed her daughter a folded note Delphox had written:

| Which power will she choose?
| Water like her mother? Fire like her father? Grass like her grandfather? Ice like her grandmother?
| Psychic, dark, electric, fairy... or all eight?

To master them all, she must learn not just to fight, but to solve, to feel, to grow.
Wait for the years to come.

And so, with gentle chaos and a promise of more to come...

[The End. For real this time.]

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
